What conditions would have to be met in order for the U.S. led invasion of Iraq to be considered a genocide?
You missed his their/they're mixup.
I think you think you are more clever than you actually are. You come off as obnoxious.
yay
When I read this all I could see was someone so caught up in hating other people for their affectations that she herself could not comprehend the depth of her own affectations, instead mistaking them for normalcy and sanity.  I can do without that.
your comment made me do a little research, and look at the front page again.  uh, yeah.   shit.
Language is a useful (and beautiful) tool; some prefer it sharper than dulled.
When eating:  Pepper = Colder, Salt = Warmer.
You mean Miami Vice fame, right? The original...
Obviously, Zero Tolerance and banning alcohol for those that are under 21 aren't working as intended.   Darwin wins.
Ahem!!! Hi ladies!
I concur.
She put her glasses back on?
Not to excuse the actions of Israel, but other than the the original foundation of the state in 1946, much of that land was acquired as spoils of war where Israel was NOT the aggressor.  I just want to make sure there is some perspective here.
Gore would be a powerhouse if he were running. Too bad the sonofabitch seems content to play around with Keynote.
Remind me to let you know when I value your opinion of me.
I'm an atheist. I think all religion is fiction. But, people are free to believe what they want to believe. I don't go around lecturing people about their faiths. However, the beliefs of a church are distinct from the actions of a church. If someone wants to believe in Scientology, fine. But if the "Church" regularly commits extortion, violence, harassment, and financial fraud, it should be shut down. The religion should not be banned, but the criminal organization controlling it should be held accountable for its actions. For example, Christian televangelists who commit fraud are investigated and prosecuted by the government, but people aren't arrested or persecuted for believing in Christianity or following those televangelists.
Thanks for the explanation...I'm not sure I entirely understand the distinction, but since I'm not a Quaker I don't really have to...
sorry i'm late. where's everyone else?
Yes, the lesson here is to kill as many of these monsters invading your home as you can so as to lessen the chance that you or your loved ones are killed instead.
FUCK QUICKTIME
Leaves no distinguishing marks from inflicted pain, just how the government wants it.
What's with all the questions?  I think it's my turn to start asking them buddy.  What's your obsession with Jews?
I told my 6-year-old cousin that everyone on Earth was just a simulation designed to train me for life on my real planet.  He cried when I told him my training was almost finished and the simulation machine would be turned off soon.  I feel slightly bad about this, but not really.
ditto! Who knew you could crack such a funny joke not only about killing your parents, but about the violence-in-video-games bullshit!?
Neil Gaiman should try his hand at doing something interesting with fairy tales (see: Vertigo's Fables series) instead of half-assed shit like Mirrormask, though I will say that the film adaptation of Stardust was more entertaining that I was prepared to give it credit for.
Too bad Chrysler's going out of business.
My dad did that to me when I was 9. On my birthday he comes home with a Nintendo game console, two controllers, mega man 2 and mega man 3 and some other games. I nearly shit myself considering I usually get a chocolate bar and a sweater. Well later that day some people I knew came over asking for their console back. Turns out the fucker merely borrowed it for a few hours and told me it was my present to make me feel good for a few hours. Never stopped hating him since. 
Post it to FD. Let them worry about it from there.  It really is the best option for you the researcher.
Who *isn't* obsessed with Jews?
It is a crime that EoE isn't in the Top 50, much less 250!
As a musician from a family of musicians.... I'm ashamed that was called music.
In progress.  Also, the large amount of time that has passed muddies the picture as to who is responsible and who isn't.  Redress would be difficult.
who's design? 
Thanks asshole.
Why do you infer the poster means non-consensual?
The public might not know this but Senator John McCain was born in Panama â€” another country or foreign land. Per the Constitution this prohibits Senator McCain from running for office. 
Where the hell is this Panda riding a puppy that's mounting a xylophone??
what happened to that google presentation document with the stick figures... anyone with that link?  (of course this article is very clear, but not as concise and entertaining as that)
&gt;&gt;I defended some of her views.  &gt;Her belief that children are harmed by having access to food, clothing and shelter.  &gt;Her belief that as a society, we should allow men to pay no child support, so that women who bear child outside of marriage or who end their marriages will be punished by seeing their innocent children starve.  &gt;Her belief that we should discourage, even prevent, the use of condoms and the HPV vaccine, so that the resultant disease and rise in infant mortality and birth defects will scare young girls out of having sex. Even though statistically we know that most young girls who have sex do so because they are pressured into it by adult men.  &gt;Her belief that the US would be better off if we used economic pressure to force teens and preteens to marry the adults who molested them.  &gt;Her belief that putting large numbers of adults who like to have sex with minors in the homes of America's children is a good thing for the kids.  &gt;Her belief that the many US presidents, Nobel laureates, business owners, doctors, lawyers, etc., educated during one of the cycles where phonics wasn't a fad are illiterates suitable only for minimum wage jobs.  &gt;Your defense of these views reveals you to be just as much a lunatic as she.  That is a complete distortion of both her beliefs and what I wrote, and you know it, you lying coward.
Carl Sagan probably isn't.
Yeah, but try explaining that to a judge.
See, you give this kid an Xbox, and his parents will probably sell it. ^__^
Well, if Pelosi doesn't do the only thing left (impeach Mukasey for violating his oath of office) then yes, Bush is the king. We're at the showdown of a check vs. a balance. 
 def sorted(L): return [] if not L else sorted(   [x for x in L[1:] if x &lt;= L[0]]) + [L[0]] + sorted([x for x in L if x &gt; L[0]])
RON PAUL 2008!!! =P
What will public opinion look like in the U.S. as the elites lose more control of the flow of public information and discourse?  What strategy might they attempt to regain a footing?
&gt; trying to hijack this thread  Oh, hey: welcome to reddit.  We have **actual threads** here.  It's not like unthreaded phpbb or unthreaded blog comments, which have one 'thread' which can be 'hijacked'.  &gt; crazy objectivist rant  What I've said isn't crazy, isn't objectivist, and isn't a rant.  If you've such a failure in your perceptions, I suppose it doesn't shock me that you'd prefer to truck in a mystical, poorly defined 'fascism'.  If you can't RTFB, it begins with an illustration.  A picture.  Can you look at the picture?
At least he's brave.  More than I can say for the Bush twins.
I though "awry" was pronounced "awe-ree".  Oh, and I also believed in God.
&gt;&gt; Remember the chant: Victims Holocaust Victims Holocaust...(continue ad infinitum)  sakebomb69:  &gt; I save that for the really compelling arguments like when we're accused of orchestrating 9/11 or the money supply.  Edit: sakebomb69, not 99 :)
He's an anomaly. 
That's what happens to women, they look hot when they're young, then it's all downhill from there.
You have a lot more faith in people than I do :-/
You're right, "there is no such people" like that IQ on reddit.  You're a disgrace to the rich intellectual tradition of our people.
Heh. I edited that post about 5 times because I kept finding more problems, and I still missed one!  Sheesh. That's got to be something of a record for homophone errors per line.
How many bankers at the top are Jews?
Indian Givers.
Am I the only one that was so busy checking out the computers that you didn't notice the guns until later?
I'm currently in school to be a high school English teacher and I couldn't agree more.  Forced reading sucks but it's usually the state the decides curriculum, meaning lowly teachers often have little to no input on what students are taught.  Of course, sometimes the instructors genuinely like the shit they're forced to peddle...you should've seen my high school English teacher's response when I tacked "Shakespeare is overrated" on the end of one of my test answers.
After my wealth increased significantly I got a letter stating that I had finally qualified to become a member of the ruling elite and could now join the CFR, Freemasons, visit the Bohemian grove and that I would be filled in on their...I mean our evil plot.   I have yet to receive my membership card but it's supposed to get you free gas at the pump and admittance to all secret meetings at which we plan false flag operations, plot against Ron Paul, and laugh at all the little sheeple. 
Uh, what about that BEER that costs a buck more than a week ago? Now THAT I want to know about! (And tell me something different than the price of hops and gasoline...)
What sort of abuse?
have as much sex as possible
It's staunchly anti-Zionist exposing Israel's crimes against humanity in cooperation with Zionist-hijacked foreign policies of Imperial West. There is a difference between anti-Zionism and anti-Semitism.  When you call the web blog site in question "anti-Semite," it makes the web site impenetrable in proving that the detractors are nothing more than reactionary shills for Israel doomed to perish when the day of reckoning come to them, whether they know it or not -- mostly the latter in refusal to shake themselves out of the great illusion of self-perpetrating deception promoted by the mainstream media and Israel to protect *their* self-centered interests.
XFD UT3 SUCKS SHIT
Something similar happened to me earlier this week at CVS, some lady, also sickly skinny, was bitching about how heavy the bottled water packs were and demanded someone carry it to the desk for her. I already hated her, then while she took 15 minutes to pay for all kinds of stupid cunt resaons she steps aside while she organizes her wallet and says you can go ahead and just pay for your stuff over my water. I payed and on the way out says to someone "I can't beleive that young strong boy wouldn't carry my water"..." What's with men nowadays?" and I stopped just before the door, turn and said maybe if you weren't a miserable bitch I would have, got a chuckle from the other guy behind me who had to wait and I left. 
What the fuck are you talking about?
Giving free stuff away on craigslist is fine, I've done it lots of times and it's always worked out perfectly with no hassles.  You just have to use some judgment about who you interact with, just like you should do if you're selling stuff too.  It's really simple to easily give things away on craigslist without hassle:  1) In your ad (regardless of if it's true or not) write that it's not in great condition and it's big and heavy and it's entirely up to them to get it out of your house and take it away, you won't be helping at all.  2) Don't put your phone number in your ad, just use the craigslist temporary email forwarding address that it automatically assigns you.  If a person emails you back and sounds demanding or annoying, then don't even mail them back, there'll be plenty of other respondents to choose from. Easy, no problems.
180 years vs. 60 years?  It's not that big of a difference in the grand scheme of things . . . and history since the 1800s has been pretty well recorded.
Wait a minute ... why does the wife have the lover's last name and not the angry husband's last name?  
I've not advocated a solution. I'm just becoming increasingly frustrated at the "organic" and "natural whatever" movement as the impression I get is that people really aren't financially promoting what they're really interested in. They're being misled and fooled by labelling. We need easy to understand labelling that concisely puts across information that the public care about.
That was kind of my point.  Anyway, it seems everyone has been missing this line from the source:  &gt;the State Patrol now acknowledges was displayed within the law.
Good point. This only serves to support the impression that the traditional media is out of touch.
I realized when I was little, that a mommy and a daddy with brown hair would probably have a kid with brown hair, same with blond, etc.  So I believed that if a mommy and a daddy dyed their hair blue while the mommy was pregnant, the baby would be born with blue hair.
pn6, anyone can look at your posts and see the positions of Phyllis' that you supported.  If you're uncomfortable with your defense of her screeds, maybe you should rethink your position instead of trying to revise history.
Didn't seem that scary.  Its a far cry from "if you elect xxx terrorists will come and kill you."
&gt; Hey there sfgate, care to fill in the blanks?  The poor media is only beginning to learn that we like to know House and Senate bills by their [searchable names](http://thomas.loc.gov/).  Local laws are right out.
Judge Jeffrey White said. . . said he had "an obligation to get it right" and that "I took an oath to uphold the Constitution."  Good for him!
And why would you not install adblock to your EEE?
happy birdizzle son
&gt;Mexico - 1980 - 100 million gallons An accident in an oil well caused an explosion which then caused the well to collapse. The well remained open, spilling 30,000 gallons a day into the ocean for a *full year*.  You'd think that with such a shabby economy, the first thing Mexico would do is close off that pipeline, especially so soon after the oil crisis.  But nope.  Hooray for good thinking.
that's one of the few pictures I've seen where she looks genuinely happy a prescient image indeed
that kind of thinking, I'm sure, was used to argue that it was a right for slave owners to beat or rape their slaves. Way to go; you've single-handedly moved human progress backward a  bit.
Okay, I don't think we disagree over much of what you're saying here but my point is that the vast majority of people don't have any option but to return their bricked 360 to MS.  Admittedly he did have a one of a kind case on his box but there aren't really many options when it comes to fine art restorations on broken 360s.  Good luck trying to convince an insurance company that original Rooster Teeth artwork (undeniably cool as that may be) is actually worth anything other than the ink that was used to draw it.  All I'm saying is that I think it's sad that whoever was given this 360 to repair didn't turn around to the nearest supervisor and say "Boss, what should I do with this?"  It's more to do with the lack of individual initiative/responsibility in modern customer service.  It's the same feeling I get when I call somewhere in India from here in the UK and feel that horrible creeping sensation that nothing they say or any of the promises they make will have any relevance to my individual complaint or request. In an ideal world (yes, I know) his specific request that his case should be treated with  particular care should have made some difference.  The fact that he was dealing with a huge corporation should not have made a difference.  Just think how much different the coverage of this story would have been if he'd received his 360 back fully working in it's original case with a post-it stuck to it saying "love the case dude" or some such.  Not that hard to do and priceless in PR terms.  I'm not completely naive, I know how unlikely that is in the modern world, but shouldn't it be something we push for?  That being the case I think it's fair to publicize a situation where someone, and it doesn't really matter who, drops the ball this badly.
believed in god
This occured only last year (*My friend Kurdistan that is*), And this was after the EU accession talks   The reason I brought it up was to discuss how modern day Turkey in general is racist to Kurds, therefore any reason they give for attacking the PKK is taken with a pinch of salt   After billions of dollars spent and many years of state policies, what is ironic is that this war by Turkey has united Kurds more than ever  Kurds in Iraqi Kurdistan see this not as an attack on PKK which turkey claims is the reason, but rather an attack on the only Kurdish goverment and stable region with full rights for Kurds...And also because of Kirkuk   PKK is just a side excuse, and turkey should learn that after razing some 400 villages and murdering an unknown amount of politicians and innocent Kurds that the PKK will never go away until turkey re-assess its racist idealogy towards the Kurds  To follow attaturk's idealogy of "There is no Kurdish problem because there is no such thing as Kurds" should be eliminated, otherwise this war will never end  PKK is a reaction to the turkish state policy not an action taken by misguided confused people...They've seen with their own eyes how turkey treats them, and they have decided that they will fight it, considering the political route has been all but shut by turkey.
The answer to that question is that the entire Arabian coastline is covered in oil.
We're working on it. The way the dollar's dropping, pretty soon the tribes will be able to buy the whole nation for some beads and trinkets...
When is someone IMPORTANT going to stand up and say that the emperor has no clothes?  I sure hope Obama puts the Bush administration on trial during his campaign.
the video with this is excellent . I agree with the Mayor of the town. Whay cant they jsut make this a win /win situation . What is this that there always has to be a loser - I just dont get it 
please learn to math. 
No.  They both stretch out the average people like taffy.
I don't know how many times unstable metal fencing has been used as a protest sign over an overpass (apparently not often), but it is clearly now an issue, and needs addressing.  That is what legislation is for, to tackle issues that emerge.
&gt;sakebomb99:  sakebomb**69**
A korean friend was telling me about his cuisine. Too bad for me I can't enjoy most of their delicious cuisine since I am vegetarian. "You should be fine with Japanese cuisine though", he assured me, "they have a lot of fish."
Yeah, you can't bring it up in court. So bring it up in casual conversation.
That would be true if it were true.  Businesses don't compete if monopolization and collusion are on the table, and the "free market" always has been maintained by imposed regulation.
OH REALLY  It seems almost as if you're implying that the belief in God is stupid! HOLY CRAP THIS QUESTION WAS LOADED
They will lose no matter how many cars they send.
How does the "editorial perspective" of digg.com and reddit.com compare with that of the traditional media?  Which do you consider more "in touch" with it's users/readers?
Anti-Catholic (and anti-Irish) prejudice used to be widespread in America. It was a Big Deal when John F. Kennedy, a Catholic, ran for president. Al Smith, an the first Catholic and first Irish American presidential candidate (also a Democrat) was defeated largely by intense anti-Catholic fearmongering. JFK made [his landmark appeal for religious tollerance](http://www.salon.com/news/primary_sources/2007/12/06/jfk_catholicism_speech/) largely to address the fears of Americans distrustful of the idea of a Catholic president.  JFK's presidency drove anti-Catholic bigotry  to the  rancid margin of the extremist right wing.  Here's hoping the Obama presidency will do the same for anti-Black racism.
convert image.jpg -scale x240 new-image.jpg  ImageMagick's slogan really should be "Much easier than you'd think by looking at the documentation"
We're all fucked
By anomaly you must mean "hopefully representative".
Maybe it wasn't misspelled.  He might just be crazy.
&gt;John Adams   John Adams? You mean the fucktard behind the Alien and Sedition Acts? Deserves to rot.
that's why no one will admit the world trade center was knocked down by space turtles.  
You could also look at [the top-voted stories](http://reddit.com/browse?sort=top).  It's illuminating.
at least it'll be pretty.
wow way to take an image from an article and provide no context.  welcome to reddit, we don't need statistics when we have pretty pictures.
Why didn't the Palestinians formed a state in 49-67? It's seems that they had all the land they want today.
Famous last words.
That Canada was the biggest state in the U.S. Kinda funny, considering I grew up in Alaska.
One. When in doubt, hold your hand under your chin and count the number of times that your chin touches your hand as you say the word or phrase.
As far as I remember, there were the Kebarans, then the Natufians, then the Yarmukians, then the Ghassulians.  Then there were the Canaanites.  The Jews (later to become Israelites) immigrated from around what is now eastern Turkey.  They first lived around the edges of and then integrated partially into the society.  At some point, they conquered Canaan and established the United Monarchy around 1050 BCE. It split and then was later conquered by the Assyrians around 720 BCE, etc, etc.  Then came the Babylonians, then the Persians, etc.
Or possibly taken out of context.
We'd always owe back taxes! How about "not a number"?
i thought everyone already wanted to build a supersuit.
Are you saying I should stop looking for sense in a sci-fi movie?
Are you saying that the MSM does a "basically pretty good job"??????!
they stole my idea... http://reddit.com/info/688e1/comments/  i've been downmodded i don't know why. I was asking and make one for everyone and not just ubunutu...I had it coming...
"FINISH HIM!"
Where in Oregon?
I think the trick would be to engrave text/images all over the case. Put his name and a URL leading to that video. Good luck getting anyone to buy it after that. Sure, you could damage the case further to get it off, but then its value will go down even further.
Brilliant!
Just for you...&lt;A&gt;HREF="http://evanschiller.blogspot.com/2008/02/open-letter-to-february-29th.html"&gt;An Open Letter to February 29th&lt;/A&gt;
&gt; monopolization   Is only 'on the table' if the state grants a monopoly.  There is no other coherent *kind*.  &gt; collusion  Is fine.  &gt; the "free market" always has been maintained by imposed regulation.  No, it hasn't ever been: this is a *contradiction*, and to press it in face of that is to try to paint a cruel mockery of the free market.  Which may after all be the aim.
obligatory "9/11 was an inside job" comment.  fisa was reauthorized in AUGUST for a YEAR. it's now FEBRUARY.  the ONLY thing that's expired: immunity for telecoms
There is no conspiracy.  Reddit controls the user experience.  Do not adjust your vertical hold.
And yet...if you had no rules in a 100 metre sprint it would turn into a boxing match, and no-one would cross the line in under 10 seconds.  Somehow, intefering in the free expression of athletic prowess, with rules for how to run a race, leads to better overall results.  Popular dogma about the market tends to rest on the implicit assumption of negligible barriers to entry, so established players can't take advantage of their positions without the risk of losing market share.  This is rarely the case. A market needn't be monopolised for this to happen - price-fixing and other anti-competitive behaviour is common enough even with legislation against it.  Besides, how do consumers choose not to buy paint with lead in it? How can they tell if there are no labelling laws? By the time ill effects have occurred it's all too late - fortunes have been made and people have been harmed. Switching brands and taking your custom elsewhere doesn't really have much sting to the supplier then I think.  [Edit: I didn't really address your point, sorry. Yes, I agree too much paternalism/nannying isn't helpful for anyone, and we also have may have too much. But I don't think that means "no paternalism/no consumer protection" is sensible/workable either. My random rant above extends that to people who like to avoid paternalism with "let the free market sort it out", which you didn't. sorry.]
Bingo.  I find a few acquaintances of mine who do own flashy sports cars and anti-materiel rifles act very outwardly confident and flashy.  There's a friend of mine who can read people like a book.  He uses this to his advantage in lots of ways - and one time we and one of these acquaintances of mine were having coffee together.  My friend pulls me aside later and says to me "You might already know this, but almost everything that guy is is just a facade.  He seems lonely."  The acquaintance got married two years ago - and since then he has ditched the sports cars  and completely changed his character for the better.
I hate this kind of anecdote, they always sound fake. I just can't picture these sorts of situations playing out. For one thing people don't care about other people when they're sitting in a cafe, in general they're absorbed in conversations.  I'm also sure I've read this story before, I know it's dated 2005 but the story apparently has been kept private up until now. The punch line sounded incredibly familiar.  Either way, I don't exactly feel for the author when she manages to label everyone in the story and make herself to be the witty centre of attention.  *goes off to find if can find proof this isn't original*
They do tend to weed out people that know about jury nullification. Of course they can't catch them all and if enough of the population knows about it, it becomes impractical to screen for it. They, almost never, ask outright either, you just have to let on yourself.  I'm not sure I understand what you mean by 'DP opponents' 
I think I'll do a post about the sun coming up tomorrow.
[let them.](http://reddit.com/info/69z6d/comments)
That the hole at the end was an "owie." Turns out, not so.
Please learn to understand the hierarchical nature of the comment system here at reddit.  I was not replying to psyne's comment. I was replying to SuperSnooper's. My comment made a pun on his comment hating "those math" problems. I replied as if his comment's mentioning "15 years ago" was a word problem asking how old he was then and how occasionally the correct answer to those questions was "not enough information supplied to solve." Got it?
Yet the very term is based on the idea of being "Christ like." Thank you for pointing out the flaw I find with modern "Christianity."
jews and Muslims apparently do not mix 
This is especially interesting if you're female.
There's nothing stupid about that. It's wrong, of course, but the fact that it's wrong was not at all obvious to anyone until the late 18th and early 19th century when people started really experimenting with things and the laws of Thermodynamics were worked out. (Substituting water for electricity and wheels for fans, of course.)
No, but the difference with Israel is the way they work to keep the conflict fresh.  I would be the first to agree that the present generation of Israelis had nothing to do with the crimes committed in the establishment of the modern state of Israel and so that they therefore should not be punished en masse as a consequence.  But the policy of settlements, constantly encroaching upon Palestinian land, the constant military action targeting civilian populations, all of this implicates the present generation in the same crimes committed in establishing Israel.  It is, in a sense, an ongoing campaign, by Israeli design.  Does anybody seriously believe that if we were still doing to Native Americans what Israel is doing to the Palestinians that there wouldn't be a similar outcry?  Of course there would.  The two are not even remotely similar situations.
Also from said article:  &gt;Obama spokesman Josh Earnest said the Obama campaign had no plans to sue.
[Never sit down at the table with a tyrant](http://flickr.com/photos/firstlight/119004569/)
You just start your countdown, and Haskell's type inference algorithm will halt before you can say "Blast off!".
Hmmm. Interesting. I wonder if we should trace the descendants of those people and see if they would like to add their 2 cents to this. 
Thanks, I was looking for that.  It certainly does speak for itself.  But I'll give you a chance to redeem yourself.  7 of 10 babies born to girls age 14 and younger are fathered by adult men. Do you still stand by your position that the food stamp and child support enforcement programs should be tinkered with to pressure these children into marriage with the men who impregnated them? Do you stand by your position that it would be good for the resulting offspring to put these men who like to have sex with minors into their homes?
The most shameless karma whoring I've ever seen, so of course I had to vote it up.
I found this shiny post on redstate.com:   I think Clinton calculates correctly that 2008 is her one and only chance to be the Democratic nominee for President. If she doesn't win this year, by 2012 or 2016 she won't start as the presumptive nominee like she did this time, and will already be yesterday's news even more so than Obama has managed to define her. Unlike say McCain in 2000 or Romney in 2008, preserving her reputation for a future run for President is not a constraint on what tactics Clinton will use on a long shot attempt to win the current nomination fight. Thus in terms of Presidential ambitions, Clinton has nothing to lose trying any desperation tactics against Obama. Her only calculation is do they improve her chances of winning the nomination however, remotely, regardless of what they otherwise do to her standing among Democrats. No tactic is "too dirty" unless it's obvious enough to backfire and reduce her chances of winning this year. Dividing the party would hurt Clinton's chances in the general election, but if she loses the nomination as the current trend is going she has zero chance. Being the nominee of a divided Democratic party is better for Clinton than not being the nominee at all. The only incentive Clinton has to forego dirty desperation tactics is how they would affect her continuing career as a Senator, if as likely Obama wins the nomination no matter what Clinton does. I had assumed Clinton's "Plan B" was to be the next Teddy Kennedy, the liberal elder of the Senate Democrats. That's actually a pretty powerful role Kennedy has had for many years, more power and status than most Senators ever achieve. But for Clinton, I don't know, maybe it's a worthless consolation prize that she's willing to throw overboard for some tiny chance of still getting what she really wants. 
There's still some hope though.  According to the update at the end of the article, it sounds like Microsoft isn't just going to blow him off.  A pretty good way to make it up to him would be if he got a letter of apology and Bill Gates signed the console.
Maybe she should just try to lose weight and get it over with. It's clear from her overly detailed description of the old lady's weight that she has an issue with that.  She is fat. She is not OK with it. It's most likely her fault.  Just because she can judge people does not mean she's any better than the "self indulgent and lazy" bitch she is.
Dude, that's how it works - didn't you know? The Eatsophagus and the Hydrophagus.
I know I just thought I'd throw that little fact in there.
It boggles the mind that they think that when they publish (completely in the clear), both their user ID and password, that someone who then uses it is "hacking" them.  They can sue, but they won't win.  They didn't exercise due dilligence (or ANY dilligence) with that script.  Sucks to be them.
It shouldn't, and it should.   However, as things currently stand, non-humans don't have rights. All laws that protect animals are based on how squeamish we feel about the things done to them, and how much industry lobbyists can insist they need to be able to get away with.
That map doesn't look right.   There is a sliver of land between Gaza and the sea that is coloured white in the 2000 pane. I can't see how that is considered 'Jewish land'.  BTW I fully expected this to be a flame fest. Is Reddit growing up? :-0
That calling the British Empire the British Empire in the present tense these days is a deliverate mistake
Hmm, you are right.  Thanks for the info.  That's really weird because for the most part Google allows sites with nothing but AdSense ads pointed to from Adword ads.  Seems like if they really took it serious this wouldn't be the case.
is the 2000 the present map also or has it changed since then?
who the hell is barry?
Just nuke the political landmass. If they can't learn to play nice then NOBODY gets to live there.
As I was about to comment, but you've covered many of the points for me.  The restaurant industry is already very competitive, to say the least, and the restauranteur (sp?) who expects to turn a profit after the first year is being delusional.   I worked for $2.13 an hour (thru college), plus tips and the occasional "mess up" food from the kitchen.  But I learned that tipping has as much to do with a customer's state of mind as the service performed.  Thus I got out and moved to the kitchen, where the work was demanding but the pay was steady.   Interesting though, as the titty bars I worked in were all tip establishments (for the entertainers) and I never hear anyone suggesting we do away with those tips ;). Returning to the original point, this is why I either make my coffee at home or visit a neighborhood locally owned establishment, and don't feel bad about tipping (or not) based on circumstance.
[Some say it is not about oil.](http://www.inthenationalinterest.com/Articles/Vol2Issue9/vol2issue9kohlhaas.html)
Shoot folks, I imagine most people in states other than Arizona may-just-may have more than two choices on their ballot for President come November.  There were 23 choices for Democrat in Arizona and 23 choices for Republican in Arizona (and 12 choices for Libertarian).  Isn't it time to stop voting for the lesser of two evils?
You're absolutely correct, I've seen enough egg sac nastinesses dropped by heating vents to know better.  I think my mind jumped to ants.  The rest of what I said does stand though, they go back to the nest and die and their fellows eat them.
Yes, I have, but you can take into account possible confounding factors and still arrive at judgements. Most machines out in common use will be, what, at least 1 GHz? So within a factor of about 3x of my machine? Even in that case, their _JIT_ is only about as fast as MzScheme's _interpreter_. 
No its fun to say, "Today is my 5th Birthday", which would be correct.
What do you propose the "bone" to be?  Free karma for all? Then the value of karma will devalue, the Internet Exchange will be thrown into turmoil and then we'll have a virtual Zimbabwe.   No thank you!
I do say... that is a compelling statement that they had no *physical* proof of cocaine in his 'possession.'  Not that I didn't think 3 life-sentences was excessive already. I agreed with you from He didn't have any coke.  Thank you for stating the facts of the case.
Bzzt!  The correct answer was Theodore Roosevelt.  Teddy Roosevelt.  TR.  On to the next question,
Rorschach's Diary, age 5.
That guy's a dick!
Guess he wasn't really lovin it after all....captain obvious to the rescue!!
I don't really see the harm in the original language. If I say "I swear (or affirm)," then I am doing one or the other. It's a bit vague, but nothing objectionable IMO.
This isn't evident. First, BMI=WEIGHT/HEIGHT^2, so one divides by height^2, not weight^2.  The units of BMI are kg/m^2, or surface mass density - very weird.  It might seem that a more sensible scheme would be weight/height^3 (density), because density drops with fat percentage. But apparently BMI somewhat compensates for the fact that tall people aren't just scaled-up versions of short people.
lol whats her myspace
[YOU ALTERED THE CONTRACT!!!](http://thedailywtf.com/Articles/Security_by_Insanity.aspx)
The first two are easy with Rails - it doesn't exactly encourage it, but it's still easy.  With regards to natural primary keys, I've yet to see a good argument for their practicality.
This is the awesomest comment ever.
Hooray for reading!
In that case, in that case let's buy a bunch of booze in preparation for March Madness! We can charge it all on our credit cards! 
its definitely not accurate but it could be a good thing or it could be a bad thing if it was.
The one time you need fake id......
If you continue to address me in such a polite manner I will find it hard to type my witty and sarcastic barbs. Please stop immediately!
Dude, all you do is post stories about how much you hate women.  That is your fucked up business, but don't act like you even know about "fairness".  Some of us actually have women we care about in our lives.  Yeah, sometimes they may be a pain in the ass, but they deserve some respect, unlike the really fucked up shit you post. And don't even say you don't hate women because I have seen some other stories you have posted, and you are sadly fucking obsessed with trying to prove that women are rotten.  Get your fucking head shrunk.
Someone post this on Wikipedia.
I'm simply assuming that the author of the linked article is not lying.  &gt; &gt; I have seen Ruby code littered with calls to respond_to? Rails calls it about 200 times.   If you care to verify this, go right ahead, but I'm not going to bother.
Great response.  Much better than: Hillary is such a crank with another attack ad...blah blah blah....
Some context: Most of the UN partion land given to the Jews was desert...
What is your current impression on the subject?
You can thank Feinstein, be sure to let her know how you feel.
Thanks, but I'm sorry, that's not correct. And I make no claims that have not been made by many already.  Crop and ingredient prices have shot up in large portion  due to increased demand due to increased population and urbanisation (urban populations demand more processed food) as well as reduced supply. The reduced supply is due to things like land re-allocation for biofuels and weather problems (e.g. coffee).   E.g. http://www.technologyreview.com/read_article.aspx?ch=specialsections&amp;sc=biofuels&amp;id=18173&amp;a=  http://www.iol.co.za/index.php?set_id=1&amp;click_id=13&amp;art_id=vn20080229050523934C280763  There is also speculation and opportunism. Fuel prices have an impact too, of course, but you can't say it's all or even largely due to fuel.  No, meat in any shape is highly energy inefficient, organic or not. Sun-&gt;plants-&gt;animals-&gt;humans is at least an order of magnitude less efficient than sun-&gt;plants-&gt;humans. Flying veg from New Zealand costs less energy than meat from your own farm.  The example you quote would never, ever feed the population as a whole, merely a small subset. There is not the land available to do so (i.e. extensively) and you are wrong that no energy or water is needed for any scale that would actually feed the world. You want to use even more of the world's surface than the 30% already used by livestock? Would you like to cut down more trees to make room for them? You think clean water is that plentiful and needs no energy to provide? And you ignore the methane emitted which is huge.  http://deliciousearth.wordpress.com/2008/02/21/does-the-food-you-eat-involve-burning-dirty-fuel/  I'm not a veggie evangelist, I repeat. I'm not saying we can have no meat. What I'm saying is that current trends are completely unsustainable.  Also, if we stop buying produce from South America, Africa etc, we're telling them we won't help them develop trade and markets and so on. I'm not saying that means we *should* buy from them , but that our choices have many impacts.  It would be a pity if the spirit of your comment was lost though; local is good, thinking about what you eat is good. Just there are other factors. 
Ah, that's a great one. I still bring that up when I'm drunk and I'm pretty sure the people I'm around won't get offended. Of course, judging the offendability of people when you're drunk is kinda like doing calculus while you're high: You may think you're right but you just end up looking like an asshole.
What the hell, Reddit? This would have been mercilessly downmodded and refuted two months ago.
Here is your damned angel when his wings are revealed fake! A pandering POLITICIAN!
People are idiots, if they are willing to do that, i say good job to kellys for seperating stupid people from their money before they do something even dumber with it.
The Palestinians were offered a state by the UN in 1947, at the same time the Israelis were offered a state. The Israelis accepted. The Palestinians rejected. Then the surrounding Arab countries began an imperialist war in order to divvy up the Palestinian territory for themselves (at the expense of both the Israelis and the Palestinians). Since they were too pigheaded and selfish to coordinate their forces and defeat the Jews, and the Jews had an incredible command structure, a very adaptive (in spite of being amateurs) military, and intimate knowledge of the territory, the Jews won, and expanded their territory beyond what the original partition plan dictated.
It uses Yahoo media player, so it does not work on Opera. Which browser are you using?
That "progression" is a little skewed - yes the state was made after WW2, and it probbaly was a mistake. But from there to the gains made in 1967, that was a gained by repelling arab attacks - most notably the Yom kippur war.   Yep -  the creation of the state may not be "kosher" - but they were attacked - and defended and won their territory.   They defended their position, and in the big history of the world - if you can do that - it is yours.   Al Jazeera had a wonderful (short) article of analysis about why the arabs lost the initial fights with Israel - get this  infighting, not cooperating and not working as a team.  sound Familiar?  http://english.aljazeera.net/NR/exeres/5AAD565D-5D50-4DA8-9320-8E78D35F65F9.htm  But to dismiss that they were attacked (a couple times) and held their own (with their own troops) means they are sovereign, and we can bitch about that with little pictograms all we want, but in human history, short and long term - that how it's been done. I'm not Pro-Jewish or Pro-Arab  - I think they should get this shit settled by now so the everyday people can go about their lives without worrying about suicide bombers or military presence with a million controlling checkpoints. If the people in the Arab community really wanted to help the Palestinians, doing their best to keep provoking israel into conflict (like kidnapping the soldier and pulling him into lebanon, most recently) they would stop that pointless BS. Israel could relax and come to it's senses and let their iron grip of palestine ease up a lot. It is unfair, but as long as they feel threatened, their actions make sense when viewed through the tinted glasses of continual fear and protracted conflict. 
My brother and I tried that many times. We never got very far...
There is nothing wrong is seeking redress from the courts.  It just so happens to be a fundamental right granted to us by the First Amendment.
I want a candidate who isn't afraid of the people.  I want a candidate who agrees that government at a bare minimum should not impair by action or the threat of action a persons right to self-defense. [LSAC](http://www.lneilsmith.net/libertar.html)
&gt;What do you propose the "bone" to be?  He wans a boner inside him
'[Cue](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/cue?r=75)' is correct here.  -noun  anything said or done, on or off stage, that is followed by a specific line or action: An off-stage door slam was his cue to enter.  -verb  to provide with a cue or indication; give a cue to; prompt: Will you cue me on my lines?
it was about 79 degrees today and partly cloudy.  you should return.
Joke? Here's ajoke: http://reddit.com/goto?id=6968n
Maybe a "master karma class" where anyone who's got more than one karma point teaches the rest of us how to make headlines that get the article read.  Or just teach us not to care about karma. The karma thing is a joke, really, aside from the fact that it influences how one can submit and whether or not submissions are buried.  I've been on reddit probably a year and a half now, and I've got one karma.  I'd like to contribute but can't help but feel it's pointless.  Oh well.  I'll continue to leach off the community till I come up with a better idea.
18, its when you're alive!
No, you just want to make sure that you revise history and justify what the Jews have done, and continue to do.  That's not perspective - that's propaganda.
So wouldnt that shoot down all theories that all Americans are brainwashed because the zionists control the media? 
This is a non-issue and only takes focus away from the real issues.
not everyone is decent. but most people are
How old were you when you saw your first hardcore?!?
well when you spend all your earned cash on crap and unnecessary garbage you tend not to have any money left. funny how that works out. 
I don't get it. What did quoting two people's replies show?
The key to dancing has nothing to do with how you move your body (aside from basic consideration) and more how you interact on the dance floor itself.  Are you bumping into others? Do you have a flaming object in your hand that others have to dodge?  Are you using a beverage as a prop and spilling it on the floor so folks will slip or stick? Are you attempting to dance with others uninvited? Are you flailing about taking up too much room? These are the important questions to ask about your dancing.  If you answered no to these then get out there and dance.  It's fun!
A-okay with me as long as they keep building casinos so that I can strike it rich.
Be sure and let me know exactly how I'm supposed to avoid unexpected illness. I'm sure everyone wants to know.
Only 6.5 billion to go.
Why didn't the Jews simply try to get along with the Palestinians and blend into the population?
Drink as heavily as possible. That way, you'll be nice and relaxed.
I think I missed the boat on that reference, Link?
The Jews make damn sure of that.
Take it twice. My two english scores increased a combined 180 on the second testing (my math was 800 the first time, so there was no room for improvement).   Know your basic word roots, and best of luck.
I believed that until I was 19.  Don't ask about high school.
[Per Ardua ad Astra](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Per_ardua_ad_astra)  Yes, it is the RAF/RCAF/etc motto, but I think it is a damn fine one for any nation. By working together, we can achieve anything.
Ron Paul also wins.
&gt; Gawd, vegetarians are so self-righteous.  You're certainly right. I self-righteously expect to be able to kick a dog that's bothering me, given the way we as a society treat, say, farm animals.   What's good for the goose, as they say.  &gt; I think most vegetarians are vegetarians just so they can exclaim to others: Hey, look! I'm a vegetarian!  And I think most people who complain about vegetarians are uneducated shit-for-brains assholes. Ain't it great to have an opinion?
This gets my vote for 'favorite comment of all time' 
The guy who made the remark has a well established reputation as being a "dove" with regards to this issue.  I think that he subconsciously was predicting what he thinks is going to happen to the people of Gaza if a solution cannot be worked out. 
Not commenting on the merits of the trial, but "The check was cut days after the meeting" sounds a lot like "The check was dated days after the meeting"  I've post dated a check, which doesn't mean I magically wrote it in the future.
Doing well on the test means learning to take the test.  If you've practiced and paid for the classes, you should be fine.  Otherwise, I'll see you the University of Phoenix.
Get good sleep, eat a decent breakfast.  Seriously, if you don't know the material by now, you're probably not going to do yourself any favors by staying up all night prepping.  Do the best you can at focusing on your desk and not noticing other people. If you have the opportunity to take it again, relax and view this go-round as practice. You might do well enough not to need to re-do if you don't stress too much.
You're pretty audacious at thinking hope, using the power of imagination, does not inspire people.
I don't know any Catholics who -really- belive in transubstantiation.  Even the really devout ones I know take it symbolically.
Did you get first post, too?
&gt; If you walk up to a black man and call him that dreaded "n word" or tell him he should be tap dancing and eating fried chicken, you'll be thought of as a bigot, but if you insult someone's appearance to their faces in public or tell a fat woman she should be on Atkins, it's considered "helpful advice."  As we all know, black people are black as a result of poor decisions, while fat people are born that way.  Also, Atkins is a terrible diet.  EDIT: "whole" != "while"
- That if people did bad things, they would be punished  - That if people did good things, they would be rewarded  - That if people worked hard, they wouldn't go hungry, or go without medical care, or lose their property or rights  - That politicians worked for the betterment of citizens  - That I had super/magical powers that would someday manifest themselves (still hoping on that one)
It has changed.  The Palestinians are being pushed out of the West Bank and Gaza.  Have you heard of The Wall?  It's built largely on Palestinian land by the Jews.
I know that This isn't Donald Rumsfeld's desk because [he doesn't sit down](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A946-2004Jun23.html).
And *we the people* are the basis of government, so therefore... 
If a cop is arresting you without a warrant or probable cause, you are entitled to resist, using as much force as necessary.  If necessary, you can shoot him dead.
[We have met the enemy, and he is us.](http://wallstreetexaminer.com/blogs/winter/wp-content/uploads/2007/08/kelly_pogo_earthday.jpg)  Let's face it, Americans are the new bad guys.
Last mission in every Ace Combat.  Fly into a tunnel and shoot something.
Responding to an insult with fists just makes you look dumber than the insulter. It's situations like this when I regret not having devoted my life to creating hip hop chants and singing them in public.
LOL, too true!
&gt;I don't suffer from cognitive dissonance.  Then how do you explain the fact that you're a socialist who supports free markets? Do you know the meaning of these words? Do you know what these concepts are? I would love to hear you explain how you can be both a socialist and an advocate of free markets.
whaaaaAA? Jesus wasn't a jew, he was a christian!!!!
lol.  I was thinking about that when I was writing it.  Aside from some small part in Africa, we're all basically refugees/immigrants.  I don't think anybody has any real claim to any land anywhere, when you get down to it.  Can't we all just get along?  :-P
KILL WHITE-TEA!
Yes. *en flambe* means "on fire."  *en gros* means "fat."
I never voted for it!
All of latin america is like that.  Beats paying for a paint job.
You could be a late bloomer. That would be me, too.
mplayerplug-in
Anyone reading it knows it was posted to anonymous wiki site--they know there was no burden of proof and view it with the appropriate pinch of salt.
Also from the article:  &gt;Teens who date older partners had a lower likelihood of consistent contraceptive use. For each year a partner is older than the respondent, the likelihood of always using contraception decreases by 11 percent. (In this study, on average, first sexual partners were one year older than the respondent.) Child Trends (2004).
mmmm burritos
This is all pretty much BS - if you want to look at a Palestinian land grab, look at Jordan.  "Greater Palestine" comprises all of modern-day Israel and Jordan, but the Brits decided to give Jordan to their friends the Husseins.  Also, Jordan has murdered many more Palestinians than Israel ever has, but we don't want to talk about that do we?  It's much more fun to bash Israel than to talk about how the Balfour declaration promised land that was already promised, or how non-resident landowners in Beirut sold the land out from underneath the feet of their tenant sharecroppers.  Let's just continue to blame the Jews and take a fucking blind eye to history and what's really happened, because *of course* only the events after western protesters get run over by bulldozers really matter, right?
ah seems I may have read it from this which is probably from the journal she mentions:  http://www.egeltje.org/2005/08/31/is-she-pretty-on-the-inside/  Much better story without the "and everyone stood up and applauded and I was awarded a medal!" type stuff.
What about soup?
I think the real shocker is finding out that at least 30% of it was spent in a manner deemed acceptable, as opposed to ending up in PM's Swiss bank account.
I'd like a link to the photo's page, too. 
As a child I could not believe humanity had the ingenuity to create complex electronic devises - though we could reproduce the technology eventually, but often they were defective copies and would malfunction.  Because I could not understand it, neither could any other human, so the source of the technology could not be of this earth.  As I recall, that explained why cinema used to be black and white (and even mute) and how radically technology was evolving around me.  I was born in the early 80s. Before there were computers, everything was a bit more rugged - appliances had actual wood in them and plastic molds were leaky. That made everything look handcrafted, cheap copies of alien technology.
By "hopefully representative", you must mean dead.  Which would explain why Carl Sagan probably isn't obsessed with Jews.
It depends on how drunk the girl is.  If she's passed out then she's too drunk to consent it can be rape.  Not always mind you, for example, in an ongoing relationship the girl may consent while she is sober to having sex while she is passed out.  Anyway, if the girl is drunk, not passed out, horny and begging for it then it should not be rape.  The problem is that men and women are different and for the most part men are more sexually aggressive.  Thus, drawing the line can be difficult. 
I know I should be studying instead of asking on reddit. I've been taking prep classes and studying but I was just wondering if you all had any tips?
Kewl info. Thanks.
You're absolutely right. The Arab League (with a British command structure), the Arab Liberation Army, Iraq, Lebanon, Jordan, Egypt, and Syria all invaded Israel in 47, and were all decisively beaten by a bunch of settlers who only learned how to fight a war *as they fought a war for their very survival.* It's one of the most incredible wartime success stories in human history.   None of the Arab armies had any interest in coordinating their forces. They were more interested in wiping out the Jewish settlers and gobbling up their land. 
Let's see, all the shit my older brother Rod used to tell me.  I asked him what a computer was (it was 1970, I was 10) and he told me it was a machine that knows everything. That scared me away from computers for quite a while.  He also told me that when you wanted to move to a new town, you had to call ahead and get permission from the carpenter there, so he could build you a new house.  Another one I believed for way too long was when he told me that when you're old, nothing costs anything; once you're past a certain age, everything is free.  He was actually a pretty good brother, and there were things I just never believed right off the bat.  But those ones had me going for some years.
I love articles with no sources that start off with an ad hominem in the very first sentence.  The best part was, "The United States will not be intending to occupy Iraq, but to establish a new government."
Same here. Damn our modern technology.
Go back in time and do well in school.
Thanks P337, That is exactly what I came here to say. We used to do this at our houes at Xmass every year, someone would get a gag gift.  I was the only son, I got my share.
I'm with you on that, until I learned to appreciate vanilla.
Server Error  The server encountered a temporary error and could not complete your request. Please try again in 30 seconds.
She's also a clinton supporter. You wouldn't want her anyways.
Just remember: the better you do, the more expensive university you'll be able to attend, and the greater debt you'll have to pay off by working a wage-slave job that has nothing to do with your degree. ;)   And smuggle in some M&amp;Ms for a quick energy lift between sections.  
http://reddit.com/info/6ady1/comments/
I'm still afraid of white vans, to this day.
An animal is not property. It is a sentient being. We keep some as pets, and we eat others, and we imprison yet more in a zoo. But this does not give us the right to arbitrarily slaughter them or torture them.  Animals are neither human nor are they inanimate objects. They are a thing onto themselves. We cannot apply the same "property rights" laws to an animal as we do to a hammer.  I reject the notion that a sentient being can be considered property on the same level as an inanimate object. It's property-like, but not property in full.
That story reminds me of my major project for my IT diploma. Substitute general for head teacher. We ended up submitting two archive boxes full of documentation for our project.
*"A lie will travel around the world before the truth has got its boots on"*  Or something like that anyway
Saw $4.05 today 2/29/08 in Menlo Park, CA.
Daily newspapers are crap, as are general news magazines and TV networks.  But traditional journalism goes beyond the MSM.  I subscribe to a bunch of more minor magazines and policy journals.  Investigative reporting, firm logic, and deep analysis are still out there. Now, you can find some of that on blogs as well.  But I prefer non-MSM print media for its convenience.  And of course, if you want to read online, they've all got websites.
dupe
Nillary: Proudly standing for nothing.
All it takes is one person out of order to cause chaos. Which is why this idea would work for a small n, but increase it, and all the rules would go out with it.  
Notably Clojure has a strong functional twist, many lazy sequence functions (similar to Haskell), everything immutable except special references which can only be mutated in transactions (STM).
[Straw Lady](http://img266.imageshack.us/img266/8031/strawladyur9.jpg)
&gt;Work: .50 12oz; 1.25 24oz (yeah, someone can't do math)  That'd be the customer.   And I'm pretty sure the  12oz. is in a can, where as the 24oz. is in a resealable bottle. It's a value added thing. 
Hey, in my culture it's The Year of the Rat, so they're just celebrating with a free buffet.
Its like when you get that long hair growing out of your nose, and you try to pull it, but there's just enough booger on it that its slippery, and you can't quite get a grip, so you have to get a kangaroo, and grab its tail and then drag it to the fence and beat it with a platypus until a koala grabs your nose hair.  Meh.
http://www.anandaanswers.com/pages/naaFalse.html   Eugene Kanin.. PhD in sociology at Purdue university found that 43% of rape claims were false, 50% at universies.  Welcome to the new world
You can do it once I move.
During the time of chivalry rape was not a crime.  At least not a crime against the woman, it may have been, under certain circumstances a crime against the other men in her family but not against her.
I like to cheer in public whenever someone insults someone else &amp; I don't know either person.
That's just damn heartbreaking.
O-o-o-officer David. Officer David.
Right, like you are OK.
I love these stories, even though 1/2 of them are probobly made up. My favorite was the [Quing dynasty and Mesopotamian bowl bowl ad](http://filtersweep.shackspace.com/58988662.html)
Well, I was born in 1941, OK? Don't let this scare you off.  I saw map of the Atlantic when I was a kid and thought that Africa and South America fit together pretty well, but I never told anybody. It seemed too obvious.  When I saw a drawing of an atom, with protons and neutrons, I thought it was a lot like the solar system.  I thought that if I stood at the toilet and had to pee, that it was my dick seeing the water in the bowl.  I thought that germs, with all their magical abilities, were probably climbing that stream of piss right back inside my body. (I got over it.)  I thought that when it rained, it was God taking a leak.  I thought that men and women lay down together, got a certain kind of feeling, and made a baby.  My uncle told me that if I swallowed watermelon seeds, that one would grown inside me. (I'm still pretty careful.)  Used to go out to the RR tracks, and some kid told me that if you put an oyster shell on the track that it would derail the train. Late that night, I confessed my crime to my dad. He very gently assuaged my guilt and told me there was nothing to worry about.  My mother had an uncle she called "Uncle Bud" and another uncle had a black farmhand named Bud, so I decided I was part black.
This reminds me a bit of the story about the [colossal failure of a new spy satellite program](http://www.nytimes.com/2007/11/11/washington/11satellite.html). That failure resulted (in part) from the govt's decision to award the contract to Boeing (relatively new to the optical satellite game) rather than to Lockheed (old hand in the same game).
She *has* come back from the dead.
The error in this case isn't that the .NET library is unaware of leap years. It is.  But to set the expiry date of the cookie they create a timestamp which is set to current day, month but year + 1. And there's no 29th February next year. It would have been better to increase the date by adding an interval of a year (however you do that in .NET).   
Let's see. There were anti-Jewish laws in all Muslim lands from the time of the Prophet until modern days. There are anti-Jewish laws in most Muslim lands today. The Arabs kicked the Jews of out Hebron, where they had lived for other 2,000 years in 1929. Yeah, it must be the Jews fault.
That's a lot of "pedophiles". Or maybe ephebephilia is just a natural state of being.
It **is** true.  It's just not the kind of smart you're taught to exercise in school.  That kind of smart's only good for turning you into a happy little worker drone.  If you think it's impossible to learn the smarts necessary to get ahead, I'd like to sell you a bridge.  It's a great big Alaskan bridge to nowhere.
&gt; This expression has type int * int but is here used with type int  Yeah, I mixed foo and bar in the example.  &gt; I still don't see what's wrong with this. Functions map input types to output types, and from a type theoretic/logical perspective,  I really couldn't care less about the type-theoretic perspective. In any case, it is not impossible to reconcile multiple values with automatic dropping of secondary values with type theory, at least within the type system of ML.  &gt; "multiple return values" are somehow different than tuples. They're not.  "Multiple values" is a term used almost exclusively to refer to the returning of distinct values, not tuples. When people mean tuples, they say tuples. If you redefine "multiple values" to include tuples, then what do you call systems that can return multiple distinct values? Eg: https://www.lfcs.inf.ed.ac.uk/reports/94/ECS-LFCS-94-312/  The title of that paper doesn't make much sense using your definitions, does it?  &gt; because it obfuscates a code fragment's meaning  No, it doesn't. When auto-dropping of secondary values is used in Lisp, it's almost always clear by the name of the function what the primary value means.  &gt; You have here a partial function whose signature is not well-founded (what if 'nil' is not defined for the type?),   Lisp is typeless, so that doesn't matter. In practice, type-punning on nil is extraordinarily useful.  &gt; Even still, it seems fragile in the presence of local code changes. For instance, what if "(foo (GETHASH a))" is changed to accept a bool and not an int as contained in the hash table?   When a multi-valued function is evaluated in a single-value context, only the first return value is passed, all others are dropped. So if FOO is change to accept a bool, and the hash table contains integers, you'll get either a run-time type error, in an untyped language like Lisp, or a static type error, in a hypothetical typed-language with multiple return values.   &gt; Here's a simpler GETHASH whose semantics are simple and clear even for novices: val get_hash: 'a -&gt; 'b option ... match (get_hash k) with   None -&gt;   (* entry does not exist *) | Some v -&gt; (* do something with v *)  It's also a pain in the butt to use because you have to pattern-match on the return value. 
On the other hand, giving the kid a pot brownie could change the kid's life for the better.  Or at least provide a temporary cure.
If submarines can barely keep from running into mountains and Japanese fishing boats, how can they steer into a base like that?
The article misspells the URL to their webpage: http://zeropollutionmotors.us/
Because they wanted all of it.
The Bush administration isn't desperate about anything. It's been proven time and again that they can get away with just about anything.  They're simply protecting their corporate friends with the smug moral certainty that the Executive office should have supreme authority in a time of war (and possibly in a time of peace). 
rick roll
What are we arguing about?
Panic is the worst thing you can do. If your bank bites the dust, there's nothing to fear according to the FDIC. A healthier banking institution normally buys the failed bank according to Barr. "There is little or no interruption to the consumer," he says. "If you go to bed one night as a customer of a bank, and you wake up as a customer of a new bank, there is nothing you have to do." Your checks will still clear, you can still use your ATM card.  But, there can be changes to the terms of your original deposit. For example, if you took out a CD with an annual percentage rate of 3.5 percent, it's entirely possible the new bank will drop that interest rate. If that happens, you have the option to withdraw your funds without penalty.  Loans are handled differently. If you took out a loan with a bank, for example an auto loan or a mortgage, those interest rates and terms of interest remain the same regardless of the new bank.  If no buyer can be found to take over the failed bank, customers are written a check with their deposit money within 48 hours.
That's outright disingenuous to mock what he said. He doesn't 100% accept the evolution theory because of his Baptist upbringing and beliefs. He doesn't accept the "macro-evolution" part of the theory, which is just semantics and technicalities. You can read more [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Macroevolution).  But not once has he ever said he's going to force *you* to believe in what he believes in. He even goes out of his way to mention that religion is what one practices at home.   But even then, what he believes in, in terms of evolution is of no concern nor does it matter. There are plenty of Baptist and Seventh Day Adventist doctors in America don't believe in "evolution" and yet they're still treating their patients with diligent care, and performing their professional jobs to the best of their abilities. Are you going to go in to your next doctor's appointments and sequester his religious preferences? What if he or she's Hindu or Buddhist? Are you going to call him a quack for believing in reincarnation? Better not get any injections, dude, for all you know it might be Jesus juice.
"you insensitive clod"
Chuck Berry makes the girl pose, smiling with him for a Polaroid or he won't do it with her. 
"Knowing people" and "meeting the right people"  are both a type of intelligence.
Yeah, I suppose he could be fighting against Haliburton and Blackwater.
Great advice! Test taking skills are very important here too. If a question seems hard skip it and go on to the next one. Come back to the ones you did not do later. When you do this make sure that you also skip the question on the answer sheet!  Personally, I did not do too well on the PSATs, something that discouraged me from taking the SAT. However, I did take the ACT, on which I got a 33. If you have the option, also take the ACT. SAT 2s might be an idea too.
Fucking vampires.
I would if the competition sucked less.
I bet you would hide in a closet while somebody murdered your children and fucked your wife.  You'd probably watch, too.
Yeah, why wouldn't they accept second class citizen status. Who wouldn't want to be a dhimmi? They should have have covered up their being Jewish and tried to be accepted.
wow! a thread starring the two most awesome usernames on reddit. &lt;3
It's Chris Hansen!
speed
good thing our journalists are keeping the lid on the bush twins tours of duty in iraq.
I would try answering that, but your damn sizes don't make sense over on that side of the gender divide!
Some of us got tired.  Some of us got distracted.  The rest of us are volunteering for Nader.
Lucky he didn't break his hand on that big dome..
Grounds for a long, slow death.
Drastically reducing many programs, including nearly every single military base overseas would be a huge part of that economic plan which is still on his website. http://www.ronpaul2008.com/prosperity
Thanks, though you do have to give props to the poll at Gizmodo.
Within the context of this discussion it is still an imposition by some upon others.
They should just convert the school into a prison, save some time..
I wanted to deliver mail when I was little, but not because of anything having to do with reading, I just thought it would be an awesome job.
Please stop talking.
Indeed - I saw that. Topic thieving perhaps?
Directly, yes. But roaches have a tendency to step in all kinds of god awfully nasty stuff and then get into things you later eat.
Them commies are *dumb*.  Submarines are supposed to be under *water*.
Fuck me. I was watching this shit on the news earlier today since I live near Miami and they made the students look like crazy violent criminals. They never even mentioned any form of protest was going on or anything, just that there was a lot of fighting, a lot of violence and that the police were doing their best to calm everyone down. I believe they said something along these lines "Violence breaks out amongst students at ...". TV is definitely not a good place to go for your news. 
I don't have a clue.
Play it safe. Don't fuck drunk girls.
GO GO UPVOTING BASELESS ASSUMPTIONS
"self aggrandizement"
The price of the meal will not change. It'll just be billed in a different, more honest way. If some restaurant can't stay in business without subtly deceiving customers about the true cost of the meal, then they don't deserve to be in business.  That's not to concede the point that many restaurants would go out of business. Tipping is unheard of in many other countries and they get by just fine.  P.S. Starbucks is the Applebee's of coffee shops. Clearly they are not on the brink of financial collapse and do not need our charity.
Move the capital to Detroit. It's not like we're using it.
IT WAS NOT A FULL-SERVICE RESTAURANT, dumbass!
Being fat makes a person extra sensitive &amp; selfish. They cry a lot &amp; think illogically. It also decreases empathy, agility, strength, charisma, intelligence, wisdom, constitution... pretty much everything.
One more thing to add along these lines: Don't study at all the day of the test.  Keep your mind fresh.
In the last 5 or so years it has become obvious to me that anyone having children now is taking a huge risk. Especially with the $45-75 trillion in unfunded liabilities and real wages going down, it's kinda scary. Having one child OK, but 3, in this day and age? That is bordering on reckless. I see many hispanics doing this and the result is kids with little supervision, few resources and a permanent under class. If you're a working adult in 30-40 years, the baby boomers are going to tax you until you have nothing left. That or they simply don't get medical care, yet people are still having a lot of children in this environment. 
So I wrote this whole reply about how I have this friend who is a zoo keeper at the San Diego Zoo who knows first hand how vicious and dangerous polar bears are before realizing that I had mistyped cub. doh!
How gay can you be at that age?  How sure, even if you think you are?  Lots of boys are not very butch at that age.
Is this a bug in .NET framework?
Did it ever occur to you that there are still plenty of people out there in crappy situations that continue to pop out children? No one is saying that every poor family is grossly irresponsible, but the advice is still completely valid. STOP BREEDING IF YOU DON'T HAVE MONEY.
This map represents the Palestinian point of view.  I'm not saying who is right or wrong, but you should know that Israel wouldn't call this map accurate.  First, framing "Palestine" as if it was a historically a country and "Palestinians" as if they were historically a people is a little misleading.  In the Ottoman empire, Palestine was a vaguely defined region and the people who lived their mostly considered themselves Syrians.  After the Ottoman Empire was dissolved, The region known as Palestine became part of the British Mandate.  At that time, however, Palestine included all of what we now know as Jordan. [See this map](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/6/69/BritishMandatePalestine1920.png/250px-BritishMandatePalestine1920.png) So, the League of Nations tells Britain, "Take this administrative district and divide it into Muslim homelands and Jewish homelands".   By analogy, if the United States collapsed, imagine someone trying to divide the Southwest into Caucasian homelands and Hispanic homelands.   So Britain takes 80% of the the mandate, everything east of the Jordan river, and calls it Jordan.  The 20% to the west of the Jordan got divided roughly 50%/50% into Jewish and Muslim lands (as per the 1947 partition plan).  The rest of the story, of course, is the sad history of warfare and fighting since then.  Focusing on the land in these maps is like focusing on what happens to Otero County, New  Mexico in a division of the Southwest.  It ignores the fact that there is a huge swatch of land that was already declared to be Muslim home land that isn't even on the map.  My post, of course, could be seen as overly defensive of Israel.  The question I'd really want to ask a supporter of Palestine is this; where on this map would YOU propose to put the Jewish homeland?
india today is hardly what gandhi intended it to be.
Attack attack attack. That's all Scientologists do. It's a shame that they don't use their brains and counter any points properly.  WHAT ARE YOUR CRIMES VISARGA?
And I bet if someone was selling the normal peanuts, and there was a market for such, they'd be eager to voluntarily  distinguish their product.
There's a couple other fairly "safe" refrigerants out there that 1smartass didn't mention (I suspect they're not realistically or commercially viable, but they're listed on the Wikipedia page for refrigerants.)  [Propane](http://home.earthlink.net/~lenyr/refrig.htm) works reasonably well as a refrigerant. It's safe in the way that R12 and R134a aren't; it's heavier than air and doesn't have any toxic effects. It can burn quite nicely, but there shouldn't be enough of it in a typical refrigeration system to cause too much concern, and besides that's a different kind of unsafe.  Carbon Dioxide also works surprisingly well as a refrigerant, however it is also surprisingly dangerous as it can suffocate you without warning and has various other toxic effects even in relatively modest amounts. Again, this probably wouldn't be a problem in the amounts used in typical refrigeration systems unless it was in a particularly enclosed area, or you had your head stuck behind the fridge when it broke, but it is a concern.
LOL!  That's amazing.
she is not ungry 
Tainted food, environmental exploitation, union-busters, child-labor, shantytowns, tenements. Hmm... sounds like China.   Racist hiring practices, monopolies. Oh my.  Local theocracies and a few hundred currencies. Hmm... that sounds *horrible*.
why is everyone always so scared? chill the fuck out. In the real world ads like this are laughed at because of how ridiculous they are, portraying us as if were constantly looking over our shoulders.
Unless you are catholic then fish is not meat.. see: Good Friday
Sending a swat  team to an innocent victim's home is not nice.  unless the victim is one of those bully cops who pushes around skateboarders or who tasers people for no reason or who arrests people on bogus charges or who commits perury or who roughs people up in the cells or who is chowing down on doughnuts when he should be working or who smacks an anti-war protestor - you get the idea.  
&gt; If demand for gold grinds to a halt, your currency loses value incredibly fast.  Nonsense: the use-value of the money commodity is always dwarfed by its exchange-value.  When the reverse is the case, you don't use the money commodity as a money at all.  As your economy grows in prosperity a unit of the money commodity can be exchanged for more and better products, and thus its exchange-value rises -- which is to say that its use-value shrinks.  What you give as the horror scenario is actually the normal condition in the growing economy!  &gt; It was abolished in most countries because  it forces the state to tax the people in the old-fashioned, obvious way, instead of in unobvious ways that are more directive (you!  Favored citizen!  Have some counterfeited money!), whose impoverishment of the people is harder for the common-person to trace.  The *only*, the single, the one value of fiat money is its amenability to inflation.  This ill use its is sole justification.
I like how everyone just accepts the map as accurate. It isn't though. [Try this for a bit more accuracy.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:1947-UN-Partition-Plan-1949-Armistice-Comparison.png)  [Or look at this article for a good discussion of the population issues.](http://www.mideastweb.org/palpop.htm  Or you can ignore actual evidence and go for cartoons that fit your prejudice.
A couple days ago I called AT&amp;T and canceled my home phone, DSL, and Cell Phone service.  The operator asked if I was moving and I said no.  "Well, can I ask why you are canceling your services with us today?" she asked. "I'd rather not say..." I said, "...*you never know who may be listening*."
You do run into that sometimes.  In my experience though, most big companies know the law, and once you go up a couple levels in customer service, you find someone know knows they have to fix it anyway.  But ya, consumer protection laws can have rubber teeth that way.
Uh, I just got a message from you in my inbox, but it's not showing up here for me to reply to.  Anyway, I don't have blog. I just have reddit.
Nancy: YOU ARE WORTHLESS This is the end game of the whole "impeachment is off the table" thing. Don't say we didn't tell you so!
Where the Queen of England lives.  \*duh\*
fuck youngturks and fuck john mccain
In India, where the paisa (penny:dollar as paisa:rupee) is the smaller currency, most prices are 79 rupees, 999 rupees, etc. Nobody uses paisas anymore.
The Muslim anger "finally" exploded in the 1920's and before. That you can't be bothered to learn history does not mean it does not exist.
As long as you're not being fat near me.
And now you finally realized that I live inside your head?
I'm naturally thin and have a hard time gaining weight, conversely there are those who have the opposite problem.  It's very hard to fight genetics in some but not all cases.  There are plenty of overweight people who could more easily lose a few pounds.  For others, to do so would take tremendous work that often just isn't worth it. 
Should we ban the whole internet then?
Hardly an insult on us Canadians, I can totally understand his desire to try and work that disgrace in his favour.  Unfortunately, he doesn't seem to realize that opening up NAFTA means that we would most certainly reply with a list of demands for concessions from the US.  Not such a good plan, but hardly an insult.
&gt; What's wrong with iterating over the pairs?  Because most of the time, I'm only interested in the value, not the key. Especially if I do something like map::find(), where I obviously know the key, so why make me deal with a pair containing the key and value?  &gt; Most of the time when I iterate over the .keys() in Python, I'm using them to look up or mutate the values within the loop anyway.   Ugh. Mutating a collection while iterating over it? Really???  &gt; If you really need to iterate over .keys() or .values() only, it's really not too hard to write your own iterator template that fronts a map iterator and provides the behaviour that you're asking for.   No, it's not, but it's a non-standard template which brings with it its own problems. 
don't be ridiculous
He knows where the hand goes.  He will simply never try hard enough.  &lt;http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Akrasia&gt;  The Greeks have a word that means something close to it; akrasia: knowing the right thing to do, but not doing it is how I define it, and i do it every day.
&gt; Gas is around $8/gallon in Germany.  At least the US has high speed trains. Oh, wait.
&gt;If a question seems hard skip it and go on to the next one.  That's really not a good idea since each question is more difficult each time.
It's interesting that you say that.  For me, I didn't think that they specifically knew God, but in a more abstract sense, they had a far keener insight into God's wishes, and were acting out His will.
awwww lets cry about it,  let me call you a wahhhh-ambulance ,would you like some cheese with your whine?
First off, Gaza is not all of the Palestinian people. Second off, if Hamas would stop trying to kill Israeli civilians Israel would probably be willing to open its border. Do you know of many countries that feed the other side during a war?
I have ideas for videogames.  I know, we all do.  But I really think that mine would sell.  Who can I pitch them to?  What if it's based on existing IP?  I work in the film industry, and if I get a show idea or movie idea, I pretty much know where to take it.  But not videogames.  Any redditors know?
Can we be sure it was the father? 
Palestine wasn't a country.  It was just a region in the old Ottoman Empire.  The Jews and the Arabs had all been citizens of the Empire.  Once the Empire collapsed, the land had to be divided into Jewish homeland and Arab homeland.  The Jews didn't want to live under Arab rule and the Arabs didn't want to live under Jewish rule.
He wants a hot dog, because hot dogs rule.
Hope he doesn't BOW out of his day job
OK, let's look at it empirically.  [Here](http://www.amstat.org/publications/jse/v4n1/datasets.johnson.html) we have a page with a file called fat.dat, which gives various measurements, including X-ray fat percentages. Now for men, &lt;12% body fat is athletic, &lt;15% is advisable, and more than this should be avoided.  Now when I plot BMI vs fat, I find that  at BMI=25 (just overweight) the fat percentage 1 sigma range is 14% to 26%.  So only about 16% of men with a BMI that is just barely overweight have a body fat percentage below 15%, the 'healthy' limit.  Now if we look at BMI=30 (just barely obese) the one sigma range of body fat percentage is 22% to 35%. Not one person in this sample of 250 men had a BMI&gt;27 and body fat lower than 12% (athletic).  BMI looks pretty good. There just aren't very many outliers. 
back in the day, there was this intro animation for HBO movies, where the camera flies down and into a wireframe model a computer rendering of the 3D letter "O" of HBO. I actually thought (and tried to argue with my brother) that the animation was depicting what it actually looked like inside a letter "O"
Nutters, the fucking lot of them!
Thank you.  Occasionally I'll hear someone say, "It doesn't matter if you can dance well. Just dance!" Then, invariably, a few hours or a few days later, I'll catch that same person snickering at some poor guy who doesn't know that he can't dance. I then remind them, "*That* is why I don't dance."
If we spent more time in bookstores researching recipes and drinking expensive coffee 9/11 WOULDN'T HAVE BEEN AN INSIDE JOB!  WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!
At least you figured it out eventually.  Unlike most...  *shudder*
That explains why you are silent on Darfur. And the Congo. And Burma. You talk about Israel because you know that there is a good chance that the Israelis will respond.
You know, it looked really good in the can. Smooth and white. I tasted it once, and never again.
i loved how real the physics are and the interaction between the 'objects' on screen.
The Obama campaign has already [released a response ad](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=879o1_pxO0c)
It baffles me to think that anyone is still surprised by his stupidity.
gwblog, you're rockin and rollin!
Here come the karma police
Downmodded for linking to a registration page. I've seen hundreds of those.
&gt;An animal is not property. It is a sentient being.  I dearly wish this were true; but it doesn't reflect the legal reality in the world today.  &gt;It's property-like, but not property in full.  I agreed with almost all of what you wrote, but not this. There's nothing "property-like" about animals, any more than there is about human slaves. We can by fiat declare that they *are* property, and out of the kindness of our hearts, institute standards of treatment. But the fact remains that we have established that Might makes Right, and our ability to subject these others to our will makes them into legal objects that depend on our mercy for their treatment, not any recognition of their rights.  Animals have their own self-interests, in living free of intervention and harm, procreating, and raising their young. A legal or ethical theory based on property means those interests are irrelevant, and can be dismissed when they conflict with our own selfish interests. A legal or ethical theory based on rights holds that we avoid interfering with  animals' interests as much as possible.
To clarify: it's not so much that you spelled "rational" wrong, but that it's not the correct word to use. You *are* rational, you *give* a rationale.
I have had similar thoughts.  I have considered 'causation' a folly as it necessitates 'existance', 'identity' and by extension 'separation' which is not necessarily something that is global, but possibly a local illusion. 'Order' and 'structure' are some other interesting terms. Consider the question: What if the 'order', 'relations', and 'structure' is globally invariant, but locally variant? Is this possible?  Is it possible for things to appear by local structure dynamic, but by global structure static? What are the minimum requirements for this to be possible?  Is it possible that a necessary condition for anything to be possible is for everything to be possible?
The Apocalypse justifies bombing the Middle East back to the Stone Age?
Technically, all humans are the same race. Two organisms are of different race if they are unable to have offspring that can reproduce. It's just not used the that way in normal conversation.
Date:   NaN-NaN-NaN (NaN:NaN)  Yep big mistake!
I'm slightly arachnaphobic.
After seeing the Captain America movie, why do you think that's a bad thing?
You lose the right to complain when you feed the beast.
If I had to choose between 100 soldiers plus 100 civilians dying, or just 100 soldiers, I would choose the later. Would you not? 
[Here](http://www.statemaster.com/graph/edu_pos_deg_awa_doc_percap-degrees-awarded-doctors-per-capita) is a per-capita ranking of Doctor's degrees by state.  The District of Columbia leads with 10.463 degrees per 10,000 people.  [Here](http://www.stat.fi/til/vkour/2006/vkour_2006_2007-12-05_tie_001_en.html) are the total education level statistics for Finland for 2006.  21,280 Doctor's degrees per 4,375,744 Finns works out as 48.63 degrees per 10,000 people.  Not only do they have more PhDs per capita, they have over 4 times as many as the best state in the US.  
Phased withdrawal of just Iraq *depending* on circumstances. Troops will stay in Afghanistan. He will also increase the military by about 10%.   So hmm... leave Iraq in 16 months, bring online 91,000 more troops. Where would they go? What would they do?   As for his Pakistani policy, Pakistan is not playing ball. What if they refuse American military intervention? What is Obama is going to do? Send in American troops anyways?  And as for what the President can do... Well, gee, sure is hard to get rid of stuff in America but there isn't any problems with adding on more bureaucracy. A Department of Homeland Security? Done! A Chief of Technology? Sure! Universal healthcare? Great! Let's pound on more tax credits and make the government offer loans for every conceivable problem! Splendid!
Is your claim that he is typical of all Zionists? Or that you have cherry picked to make them all sound bad?
I have that printer, it cost like $80 AUD I don't think that helps him overcompensate much
Some guy writes a pretty funny post about some crazy lady who bought/picked-up his fridge and people start talking about refrigerants and CFCs. There are a lot more people who need to get laid than I thought... 
So Gibbwake, you going to give it a rest now, or just hope that artman doesn't follow you around from thread to thread?
I enjoy a good tandem bike ride.
How exactly can a refrigerator kill an elephant?
I believed that going to fast food restaurants was a good way to get money, because I always saw them hand tons of money (quarters/pennies) back to my parents.
I can't see why you are being downmodded.  I want a damn dowry too!
The Exxon Valdez oil spill involved some of the most pristine and environmentally delicate coastline on the planet. 
Must've been swinging the camera really fast on the end of the strap!
Absorption systems were somewhat popular in the states at one time. I'm old enough to have seen a few. I used to pick things up in the desert and take them apart as a hobby, but I never actually payed any attention to absorption systems when I studied HVAC and Rerigeration service. I took a [Carrier](http://www.corp.carrier.com/www/v/index.jsp?vgnextoid=9d087afdef677010VgnVCM100000cb890b80RCRD) trade school cram course taught by two Carrier engineers, and even they skipped everything in our [text book]( http://www.amazon.com/Modern-Refrigeration-Conditioning-Andrew-Althouse/dp/1590702808/ref=pd_bbs_sr_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1204329856&amp;sr=1-1) (earlier edition actually) about absorption units. Although ammonia is safe from an environmental point of view, it is caustic and harmfull to the lungs in concentration. It is rare though for refrigeration equipment to develop major leaks without some kind of major impact or molestation of the equipment. Small leaks are a common service call, but nothing that would even come close to sniffing smelling salts.  Anyone who is a product of the 60s and before would remember getting big whiffs of ammonia because it used to be one of the most  popular cleaners. It's a pretty good degreaser. Brett Farve likes to take a big whiff before games and he's not the only athlete that does it. 
I went to a party the night before, passed out around 5:30 AM, got about two or three hours of sleep, and got there late and took the test in that no mans land between drunk and hungover.  It doesn't work for everybody, but I got the third highest score at my school.
There was a time when I thought that all round orange fruit with peels were tasty oranges.  Then I saw a really BIG one in the fridge and I thought "That's the biggest orange *ever!*" and I started to eat but it was a nasty grapefruit instead.  Also, for an embarrassingly long time I thought that infrared radiation was the same thing as heat.
&gt; I love the university attorney's thoughts on the matter: &gt; &gt; It's an unfortunate situation. If she'd just signed the oath, the campus would have been more than willing to continue her employment.  Welcome to the world of people who Just Don't Fucking Get It. "If she'd just signed the oath" - that's the whole *point*, you attorney doofus.  No doubt this guy would say much the same thing to an atheist fired for refusing to say a prayer with a boss, or a recovering alcoholic refusing to have a drink in a "social" work situation, or [legal drug-user refusing to give up their out-of-workplace habit](http://virtualmentor.ama-assn.org/2007/01/msoc1-0701.html).  &gt; She's being reasonable, but no one is listening because they're cogs in the corporate machinery.  Agreed, but I'd put it in a slightly less inoffensive way. :-)
Interesting... I guess this was a long exposure take somewhere near the top or bottom of the globe?
I thought they changed the language (adding "(or affirm)") precisely to accommodate Quakers? And they also allowed her to add an addendum to the oath - just not to change the one that was printed.
Why does a tanker need windows? Is that how you check the level?
Strange, I don't feel any higher on heroin when exposed to unfamiliar environments or stimuli.
Do you financially support the cruel or callously indifferent treatment of animals in agriculture or animal testing through your purchases?
get a hair cut.
You cant rape yourself
Creative writing is considered a virtue by some of us. Some feel that making up words is bad. We could probably make some kind of Venn diagram out of the whole thing.  Some would like it and some wouldn't.   
There is a good reason why there can't be such secondary independent agencies. It's for the same reason why it's almost impossible for ordinary people to go to a private school even if they have the choice. That is because they already paid for public schooling once. By analogy, here it would be extremelly difficult to persuade a customer to pay much more for independent testing since he already paid once for FDA in taxes.
I hope I'm not the only one who thinks that it is "good for him". Collective punishment -- invasion and occupation -- is unjust and immoral. And Harry isnt a fcuking Hero for participating.
The wrestler looks like the Heavy from TF2.
What a bunch of douchebags.
The daughter will be kept as a slave and raised  until she can begin repaying her fathers debt, and the price of raising her, in about 15 years.
Wait wait wait wait.  Isn't Texas a must-win for Hillary?  If she minimizes the results of Texas, then that would amplify the results of all the contests she's lost, meaning she's basically screwing herself.
Same here.  We ad a HUGE yard with rocks and swings from an 80 year old pepper tree and all kinds of stuff. I would get bruised and cut and beat up running through the yard and having fun.  My mom always thought Child Services would take me away every time I went to the doctor for an ear infection or some random little kid problem. 
pouty
Serious question: what if the guy whose house they're raiding is deaf?  How should the police announce themselves before entry?
Yes, kicking a dog is exactly the same thing as eating meat. That's brilliant. What vegetarians don't seem to get is that eating meat doesn't have to involve cruelty. But you need a soapbox to proclaim to the world how enlightened you are. So have at it. 
Yes, you are.  You are saying the Jews are right and the people whom they've driven from their homes over the past several decades are wrong.
kwgibson@utah.gov
... is a waste of time if you get off by having a mirror on your bedroom ceiling?
Whoever cleans her cage must be sick and tired of being "eyed with suspicion" by other zoo employees.
Were jammin, jammin, And I hope you like jammin, too.
Not available for Opera.
Now that's what I call real family values.  Good for them.
yeah these numbers can't be accurate.
You know, Obama has a really appealing-looking logo.  But I still don't understand why he delivers his speeches with the diction of a preacher. I find that type of an oratory style to be a bit too pretentious in a politician.
My apologies, I'm tired :P
*cough*glued*cough*
Human flesh probably tastes pretty delicious too.  Tell me I'm wrong.
Try to read for comprehension. He was clear that he wanted to destroy the country/government. He was not clear on what he would do with the Jews afterwards. Like many such people he would probably put up with them as long as they accept their dhimmi status. It is not particularly a grand defense of Ahamdinejad to say that he will put up with Jews as long as they accept their place as subservient to Muslims.
Is there a jew and an arab on reddit so that we may get both sides of this?
Yup. And a mini-gatling gun, a couple of WW2 two mg's (one german, one US) plus various other historical guns.  I've seen this pic before, possibly here. The chat then suggested that he was a games designer. 
"Former" being the operative word.  AG's being political animals isn't something new.
What Would Jesus Brew?
There is no such thing as "Palestinians."  It's just a bunch of Arabs who lived in a sparsely populated area of the Middle East.  They were/are not culturally distinct from any of the current Arabs living in countries around them.
Thank god the Justice Department is going after Barry Bonds though!
It was abolished in most countries because fiat currency, printed money, lending from a central banking system, was much easier for the government. This comes at the cost of inflation.
No, that kerchief and badges make Osama look like a boyscout. 
No.  This is new pants please.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ITDU4XksGK4&amp;NR=1
I wanted one to land on me after falling from space.
IOW, "If you're in a room with a bunch of stuck-up assholes who are all dancing, you should also dance."  I disagree. I think it's better to just leave, and find better people to hang out with.
Really, then what's the whole point to `FOREIGN KEY`? Does MySQL just ignore them?
&gt;I was even voted class clown in my graduating class.  That's got to be the most lame point I've ever heard anyone use as to proof that they "like humor".
Muslims get angry when Jews steal their land.  Doesn't really matter when.
hee hee ---someone's off their meds
&gt;I thought my parents were infallible.  My world crumbled when they stubbornly rejected my opinon (because I was just child), and I knew they were wrong.
This is a true story! I live about 30 miles north of Downtown Dallas in what use to be a SMALL REDNECK town that has exploded with growth from ASSHOLES coming from Kaliphornia and NYC!so any how about a month ago I'm going to meet up with some guys at the local Scam Bucks and pulling in to the lot I wait for this guy to back out so I can pull in and park. then this FRANKENHOOKER gets inline behind me and starts bitching me out about how I should be more respectful taking that whole big space for my Motorcycle when she need a space for her Hummer. Then I tell her nice as I can to suck my Balls if you can't drive it don't own it! Latter I'm sitting outside and come up and accuses me of starring at her. Then proceeds to tell me how sick it was that I was stalking her and  she'd call the police.So I whip out a Dollar  bill and hand it to here saying " I wasn't starring at your FRANKEN TITS, but here Take this, you aught to get as much out of you investment as you can!" so she did leave and call the cops from her cell! and Much Halarity ensued, when a store full of people told them what a cunt she was acting like  
If you think the Israelis did not start the 1967 war then you are wrong and you are Pro Jewish.  If you can talk about an Israeli soldier being kidnapped while you have absolutely NOTHING to say about the tens of thousands of Palestinians and Lebanese who have been kidnapped then you are Pro-Israeli.  No need to kid yourself.  You're not kidding anyone here.
No, you see this is how you GROW plastic bags.
Then you don't owe reparations to the Native Americans but you do to the Vietnamese, most of Central America, The Iraqis, The East Timorise, the Afghanis etc etc.
Yes and women go to bars to not get some.
&gt; If demand for gold grinds to a halt, your currency loses value incredibly fast.  This is the knee reaction and why people dismiss the gold standard as a crazy idea. What you don't realize is that there isn't a huge demand for gold and the fluctuations you see in the gold price are actually the fluctuations of the dollar (typically down). Once you've recognized this, you'll be able to grasp the enormity of our current problem.  More simply put, there is not any real demand for gold currently that will be used for physical purposes. People buy gold only because of it's value as money. The price fluctuations are a reflection of people's confidence in gold and distrust of the dollar as money.  &gt; It was abolished in most countries because you have so little control over your economy with it.  And that is why we need to go back to a gold standard. We don't want the rich controlling the economy. When they control the economy, they are fleecing us of our wealth. that is the whole point.
Has anyone who's posted a negative review actually read the book? If not, they deserve to be deleted.  I don't get this current obsession with Scientology anyway. If fucktards want to believe in this shit, I say let them.
Completely true.  When something is illegal, it is already irresponsible, so it breeds more irresponsibility.
You have a thing for Michael Stipe?
The scalable context timeline is nice! The content kind of depresses me though.
Does it matter?  Either way, he's a scumbag.
Our Great War's a spiritual war... our Great Depression is our lives. We've all been raised on television to believe that one day we'd all be millionaires, and movie gods, and rock stars. But we won't. And we're slowly learning that fact. And we're very, very pissed off
happy birthday! i got this offer from Papa John's and thought of you.  If your birthday is on Leap Day, Papa John's wants to treat you to a large one-topping Papa's Perfect Pan pizza during Leap Week.  CLICK BELOW FOR MORE DETAILS http://click.papajohns-specials.com/?ju=feff1578766400&amp;ls=fe171275736c0374701678&amp;m=fef7107570660c&amp;l=ff5e117976&amp;s=fe6115717c65057f721c&amp;jb=ffcf14&amp;t=
I can think of worse, but frankly, that was just a cruel prank to pull on that kid. Look at his face...... Jesus, the kid is heartbroken and his family is laughing at him.
No, preemptive attack is not legal according to the same link you have provided (read your own links). No, there is no big difference between it and preventive attack.  The only difference is the probability of the attack.  In preventive the probaility is less. In preemptive, it is higher.  In no case is it 100% and in neither case can anyone assess it correctly. &gt;Pre-emptive strike only deals in the immediate realm. Define immidiate realm.  Is it tomorrow? or next year?  Do you honestly think if Turkey hadn't attack PKK would be going to attack the day after that?  How are you (or anyone) going to prove that?
&gt; innocent blood is good for washing away sins  It isn't?  Shit. What am I gonna do with all of this?
Budweiser, on the other hand, make people think that water is beer.
one of my best friends is Dutch.  you guys in that area are on the ball.  and moonshot gloating aside, u.s. schools are rotten.  i'm sure finnish schools are better.
Perhaps we should remove "dairy free", "gluten free", and "nut free" from other items. I mean, this makes me think that products containing these things might be unsafe. Oh wait...
so imagine the hassle foreigners have to deal with - welcome to the nightmare everyone else faces when they have pass through the US border
Back in high school I knew someone who was in the same "hookup" role as this kid.  The difference in this case was that the guy I know dealt coke that another kid used to commit suicide.  This guy I know got barely a year. Fuck this war on drugs.
Because Prince Harry doesn't like England? I don't get it.
To be fair, the US probably wouldn't have gone to the moon had we not been trying to beat the Soviets.
Yet you utterly disagree with his most drastic policy. Competing currencies. Explain.
No, I don't think I made any comment about the correctness of what has happened since 1947.  If you disagree with the British plan, then I wonder how you would have partitioned the mandate?
Yes, but stealing words from other languages when there's a perfectly good (and shorter! and one that everyone can understand!) word you can use?  &gt;Language is a useful (and beautiful) tool  Depends on the language.
It's both their fault, including the industry which gave them the ability to get loans they could never pay back.
so, what's it all about?
&gt;He wans a boner inside him Nobody here is interested in your dad's weekend appointments. No need to share.
I actually found a youtube video with the intro scene I am referring to: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M9N9AByVnZ4
I don't think the report is accurate. A lot of PHP job posted on Houston craigs's list are lower than .Net or Java. Maybe, i'm looking at the wrong place.
[*Dons monocle and fake mustache*]  I do say, you could perhaps present your idea to me, for **I** am in the industry of electronic recreation!
A little bit I guess...
I'm curious... is there any benefit?
Billboards dont have people waving to the cars on them making a scene. I'm sure their sign wasn't *that* distracting to drivers, but their presence could easily be distracting is someone thinks something is going on. Point being, it may not be that dangerous as I said, but it's one of those things authorities would rather not have, just in case. If they hung the sign and left, then I don't think it would be any more distracting than a billboard.  f...ag?
so are you on the left side of the atlantic now or the right side?
More like sad. =( ... even though I was first exposed to Iron Man by the saturday morning cartoon... /hypocrite
Listen!  Strange carpenters hanging from crossed sticks handing out bread and fish is no basis for a system of government!
That wasn't witty at all. She just took her saying and turned it around. That's complete hackney. And man she does look pretty fat.
The reason a market economy works (at least for a while) is that it is similar to economic democracy.  This is assuming everyone has relative equal amounts of spending power.  For each dollar that is spent, it is like a vote for what is valuable and what should be produced. However, a problem arises when a small percentage of the population begins to amass large amounts of spending power.  Suddenly, their economic "votes" far outnumber all the votes of everyone else.  The result is that they draw resources away from producing things the general population needs, and focuses those resources into producing things the wealthy few want. You traditionally assume people who are well paid are more valuable to the economy. This is not true when there is large spending inequality. Those serving the wealthy (limo drivers, personal assistants, etc) are paid more not because they are more valuable to the economy, but because the wealthy can spend more. Those serving the poor are paid less because the poor simply have less money to spend. The result is an economy that more and more rewards serving the few people that least need additional people catering to them. 
My tax dollars do not support alleged atrocities in Darfur, Congo or Burma.  I put a priority on those atrocities I have a hand in committing.  Moreover, my government is not involved in these atrocities either, at least not in a way which causes blowback on American citizens, which our support for Israel certainly does.  I am very vocal about the war on drugs for the very same reason.  It is an atrocity I am in a position to help stop because it is an atrocity committed by my government.  And I would point out that the war on drugs is at root in what happened in Burma.
anger is a much better fuel for action
&gt; The value of your currency suddenly becomes dependent on outside factors.  If demand for gold grinds to a halt, your currency loses value incredibly fast  As opposed to now, when the government has complete control over the currency and inflation *never* gets out of control.  &gt; It was abolished in most countries because you have so little control over your economy with it.  Exactly.  With a gold standard, the government can't manipulate the money supply for its own ends.
â€œI would pardon all blacks, all whites, everybody that was convicted of non violent drug crimes.â€ - Ron Paul
You can have mine as well - you're obnoxious.  I remember an encounter with a girl in college and she was puking drunk.  Afterwards I had to stop her from taking my pants off and going down on me.  I didn't even know her, but she was quite a hottie (I wasn't quite as drunk, so I could tell :) ).  If I had let her continue with the actions she initiated, would that be rape?  I doubt she had all her decision-making faculties intact.   OTOH, I had a friend who shoved his hands down the pants of another girl who was *completely passed out drunk*.  That is rape.  I haven't sponed to him since (20 years, maybe) You're still obnoxious, though
Apartheid is against the law, so if the Jews are carrying out Apartheid policies and laws, and have institutionalized Apartheid then the laws against Apartheid are anti-Jewish laws.
PI ã‚¢ãƒ‰ãƒ¬ã‚¹ã£ã¦ã€IP ã‚¢ãƒ‰ãƒ¬ã‚¹ã®ã“ã¨ï¼Ÿ
You know a bunch of wussy Catholics then.  More seriously, anyone who doesn't believe in transubstantiation probably has beliefs more in line with the Protestant faiths... Catholics believe something real is taking place.
And what's the state funding per capita for the rest of the US?  DC has only a city and federal government, and the federal govn't gets final say on all decisions. I think it makes sense our federal capital would be primarily supported by federal funds.  (Would also be interesting to look at federal spending per capita somewhere like Yellow Stone National Park or Mt Rushmore...)
Fat rage!
This is exactly what I thought when I heard our dumb fuck president say this. He doesn't have a frickin brain cell in his coke addled head.
I'm thinking more in terms of doctors returning to their responsibilities.  A noble AMA might be that secondary agency.  The problem is that doctors have stood by while much of their responsibilities have been shifted away from them to irresponsible parties.
its not only that they tricked him, but then they laughed and made him feel stupid for believing it. The look on his face is painful.
i hate you
Because he's a man in a robot suit with rockets on/in it.
I believed it when my dad told me that the power plant was a, "cloud factory." I also thought that like caterpillars became butterflies, worms became moths.  I also thought there was a country called, "Texaco" near Texas and Mexico.
&gt;Nearly Half of Americans Turn to Web for News; Almost 70% Think Traditional Journalism *is Full of Shit and is Part of the Problem.*  Fixed that for you.
I have stopped being a customer of AT&amp;T for the last 3 years. I don't use them for dsl or cell phones because I consider them one of the most corrupt, bureaucratic, anti-American companies around. Unfortunately I am willing to bet at least 50% of redditors who complain about warrantless wiretapping have their iphone, cell phone or dsl through AT&amp;T.
Ha-ha.
Western culture and philosophy has a long tradition of recognizing value in avoiding causing harm to animals.  http://www.newveg.av.org/veghistory.htm  "Like most good ideas in the West, vegetarianism was developed by the ancient Greeks. Pythagoras and Porphyry were the best-known practicing vegetarians, but the list of those who advocated a vegetarian diet includes Diogenes, Plato, Epicurus, and Plutarch. The Greeks favored vegetarianism for a variety of reasons. Pythagoras and his followers believed that animals as well as humans have souls, and that after death, an animal may be reincarnated as a human and vice versa. According to this view, animals should not be killed and eaten because all souls have equal worth. Plato, in The Republic, described a vegetarian diet as being best suited for his ideal society. Plant foods were preferred, according to Plato, because they promote health and because they require less land to produce than do animal foods. Other Greek thinkers felt that eating animal flesh was naturally repugnant and should be rejected on aesthetic grounds.  The Romans borrowed many ideas from the Greeks, including vegetarianism, and in spite of their penchant for feeding undesirables to the lions, vegetarian ideas survived throughout Roman times. The poet Ovid and the philosopher Seneca are examples of Romans who expounded the cause of vegetarianism."  Seventh Day Adventists and some other Christians view vegetarianism as an extension of Christ's teaching of compassion. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christian_vegetarianism  And of course many Buddhists are also vegetarian.  Gandhi's statement isn't based on promoting specifically Hindu values, but rather a value of compassion for animals that transcends cultures and religions.
Can and do are entirely different things.  The cheapest way to raise cattle is to squish them into a tiny lot where they're wallowing in their own manure, and to feed them a lot of grain.  The results stink to high heaven, and produce incredibly unhealthy cattle which need antibiotics to keep from getting sick.  When you buy meat or dairy products which aren't labeled as organic, that's almost certainly what you're getting -- simply because its the cheapest, and you're probably not going to visit the farm and see how awful it is.
&gt;Why don't they tell us that in Economics class?  Duh, because you control Economics class too! Juse see how many Economics Nobel prize winners are Jewish...
They actually used to do this, until the infamous Curry-Levant wedding of 1873.
I know a couple people in game development, one at namco, the other at bungie.  Don't pitch your ideas to game developers, they don't really care to hear them.  Pitch them to publishers. If you don't know anything about game design or are not part of a dev team, it will take a lot of work to get your game made.  If you want to actually make the game, it could take years to work up to a place where you can actually make it.  If you are interested in merely pitching your game, send some e-mails to developers(companies, not the people), and publishers.  If you are in the film industry, ask around if anyone had their movie made into a game, or if their special effects department has any people who made games. Those people would probably be able to help you out a lot, networking with people who can listen to your ideas.  Just keep in mind, if you give your idea over to a publisher or developer, chances are, you will never see any money for it.
hehe, if it makes you feel better Google's already taken down my entire blog, within 2 minutes is pretty impressive.  I haven't read the TOU since 2006, they've changed quite a bit of it.  Still I'm surprised they can't take care of some of the more excessive abuses of click fraud.  
found this and thought it was pretty fucking funny. easily offended, beware...
They should have tried to get along with the people who lived there.
Well, I'm sorry, but I simply do not believe that property rights cannot coexist with respect for the well-being of animals. You can sit there and tell me that this is the logical conclusion when taking this scenario to it's "extreme" or "absolute", but I outright reject such a notion -- if this is the point you're making (and if not, I apologize for misreading).
"Oh look, free cocaine in my motel room!"
Of course they're not important, but it's just fun to see how many you can accumulate.
Right, because... wait, why?
It's not at all an unreasonable policy.  If everyone modified the oath as they wanted to, the university would have to assign a staff of 5 attorneys to do nothing but review these documents to see if the modifications altered the meaning and interpretation of the oath in impermissible ways.  Notice how even 1 person modifying it led to the University's main attorney having to weigh in on the matter? It's not a "do it or you're not a good person" situation, it's a "do it or we won't waste time with you" situation.
Most of the History Channel's programming is shit. What's worse is how every evening, they show some fictional Hollywood film, and pass it off as being an accurate depiction of some historical time period.
Being poor sucked. Especially when everyone made it really clear that you were personally failing by being poor as a child.
no, we are boy-girl twins. We don't look anything alike. I can see how I shoulda been more clear on that.
And prior to 1946 the nation of Palestine... oh wait, there never was such a thing.
&gt; feminist ideal of equal treatment.  Um... I don't think such an idea exists. Seriously.
That's a propaganda-driven view that does not serve the truth.
I'm sorry for the roller-coaster ride, but "Orchides" is actually "OrchidÃ©es" (that's the name of a flower), and "Orkeyday" truly is how you're supposed to pronounce it. It would be "Day Orkeyday" ("des" is "day", not "days").  "OrchidÃ©es" means "Orchid". There is no "Des Orchides" street anywhere in the province of QuÃ©bec (according to Google; it makes sense, since it's not a word), but many "Des OrchidÃ©es".  EDIT: actually, if you consider the liaison, "Days Orkeyday" is pretty good.
She's full of it. "It" being fat.
Everbank takes out 1% when you put the money in, and 1% when you take it out.  Read the fine print. It's better to open a Euro-denominated offshore savings account with HSBC or Citibank.  Or just add a Euro exchange-traded fund to your portfolio (FXE is one).
Most people don't worry or even discuss monetary policy. Everyone takes it for granted and now we're in a situation where the dollar is crashing.  In theory, we wouldn't need to change anything in the monetary policy and just focus purely on the economic models. The problem though is that someone is cheating us with the monetary policy, namely printing more money than they're supposed to do. We can't ignore it much longer.
I loled. :)
Unlimited flying time in a machine the size of a human body ... with a body inside?  Yeahno.
fu
He with the most Karma points gets all the Girls!
No. The third was so bad, it completely ruined it for me.
Healthy people tend to miss fewer work days and work for more years, so they probably end up paying more than their share of social medical costs anyway. Which is good; kids with Down's syndrome and other health problems they're not guilty of creating are often overweight, and their parents often spend more time caring for the kid than making extra money, so why shouldn't healthy people be paying more than their share?  At least they feel good most of the time and get laid regularly.
It kind of is when you're on a national health care system and everyone's paying in. (Canada.)
As in Northern France?
its not a race.....
What if it's the only thing that'll get your mind off impending death once the lights turn out?
She obviously wanted to pick a fight that wasn't necessary.  Kind of stupid to do that when a)you don't have to; and b) you have no bargaining chips. Apparently she's got oatmeal for brains.
You're a broken record.  You never answer the question.  You always have the same thing to say, whatever the context.
it won't. the douche bags have a monopoly on power. we're fucked.
Steve Wozniak was a phreaker. This kid is a delinquent, tying up 911 lines and potentially putting peoples lives in danger.  Lock him up, fellas.
I used to think that Toronto had a hockey team.
Alas...I mean, Thanks, Great!
I used to be obcessed with aliens.  When I was 8-12 years old my favorite show was "Sightings" on the Scifi channel.   I would watch or read something about aliens and then be unable to sleep in my own bed.  I cured myself by speaking to "believers" on PalTalk and Yahoo chat between the ages of 13/14.
For the corporations, by the corporations.
Settlements are, without a doubt, the single biggest hindrance to the peace process. Their budget is not published and many people living in them do not even realize that their homes are subsidized by the government - they are just moving to the cheap J'lem suburbs. THAT is what is so controversial about the wall -- not even Shalom Achshav is really that critical about its existence because terrorist attacks have decreased so significantly since its creation. However, the fact that the wall is not built on the Green Line because it is protecting these illegal settlements is a huge problem.  We met with [Gershom Gorenberg](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gershom_Gorenberg) while I was in Israel and he told us the story of the government deciding to demolish nine houses that had been built at one of the illegal outposts (the ones that are illegal even by Israeli law) and it took 3000 policemen to do it because the settlers were so resistant. I was surprised to hear that at first, but then we visited Gush Etziom and I wasn't surprised anymore. Those are some fucking crazy people and I would not want to be the one to have to deal with them. It's not surprising Rabin was assassinated.  Edit: Just to be clear, the settlements are the main reason the last panel looks the way it does.
I used to think "boots" were actually called "boots-on" due to the fact that my parents would always tell me to "get your boots on!" So, when I wanted them off...I said "I want my boots on off!"
Halo 3, I think.
Fear it.
Fair enough, thanks
It's not a war it's an occupation.
you had 3 points, I upmodded you to 4 points, then refreshed the page and you had 3 again. Something smells fishy?
Also:  No bill of attainder or ex post facto Law shall be passed.
I loved this bullshit line of reasoning. You can justify any war on the grounds that one of your great-great ancestors once lived there. These Jews came to a land from which they were not born and displaced the locals that were born there. They have absolutely no claim to the land other than what their moronic religion says. Give me a fucking break, moron. You got to be one dumb fucking brainwashed American to support that bullshit. Put yourself in the Palastinian shoes. If someone took your home and disrupted your ways of life would you not fight back? Stop funding these assholes and let them survive for themselves; or failing that, give them your home if you care so much about them.
I like that he is specifically calling on folks to avoid "fear" (of the transcendent)  There are some shades of gray to be found between the extremes of blind, frozen, religious dogma and pure, close-minded materialism.
It's worse than lack of congressional representation, they hardly have local representation.  From Wikipedia:  &gt;Although there is a municipal government and a Mayor, Congress has the supreme authority over the city and district, which results in citizens having less self-governance than residents of the states. The District has a non-voting at-large Congressional representative.  This has lead to things like a royally fucked up school system because all of the new wonky bullshit gets tried there as representatives try to test their education reform plans.
what media? you mean us? because i think we have been the only ones noticing sir.
Voted down for running Windows.
They could have NOTHING, which is usually what happens when you're outgunned by a massively superior force. I'd call that a show of remarkable restraint by the Israelis.
You seem more worried about Ron Paul than anyone here. I think a lot of Paul supporters, like our friend freshone here, like to pretend people that dislike Ron Paul do things like this and are generally moronic.  That way the rest of of us think people that don't like Paul are stupid, and wonder if backing him is the way to go.
That makes sense...  I was surprised Chase was so high on the list because any time I make a high-dollar purchase or my spending pattern is unexpected (example:  my husband buying some e-Books for roleplaying a while back), they call to make sure it's really me.  Chase and my local credit union are the only ones I've ever had do that, and they're both on the ball about it, calling within minutes when there's a fishy transaction.
It was empty so they moved onto it? I'm not sure they were in the habit of "aquiring" land in the Western sense either. The fact that some are now wealthy has no bearing whatever on the crimes of your ancestors.
"So hmm... leave Iraq in 16 months, bring online 91,000 more troops. Where would they go? What would they do?" -- Fill in the ranks of missing service men and women that have been injured or killed in the line of duty... maybe?  "Well, gee, sure is hard to get rid of stuff in America but there isn't any problems with adding on more bureaucracy." -- Which, oddly, required some consent by Congress, the same Congress that would have to consent to such things as abolishing the IRS.
Why didn't they just go for "birthplace of airplanes?"
Yeah, someone voted him down when you voted him up.  Funny how that works, isn't it?
Kucinich's idea sounds like a good idea. [Please watch Paul's views on healthcare](http://youtube.com/watch?v=KSZq1Wkanxg). Not that it will make much difference, at least you'll get my point that Obama isn't the messiah.
Well, they didn't say 'vote up'.
*"Try to catch snowflakes on your tongue... it's fun!"*   WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!! CHARLES SCHULZ WAS PAID OFF BY BIG PHARMA TO SICKEN GENERATIONS OF CHILDREN!!!!!!  YOU ARE ALL BIOLOGICALLY CONTROLLED SLAVES!!!!!!
Which of course makes it perfectly acceptable to steal their land.
Happy leap-birthday!
No military strategy scholars would say the Arab performance in that war was anything better than mediocre. They were, by all means, trounced, and aside from starving Jerusalem and some other small gains, no Arab army aside from the Arab League had any significant offensive victories. The Arabs fought an inept war against a bunch of farmers and lost.   So if that's propaganda, in your expert opinion, how did the Israelis manage to win?
action? like, getting off my chair? for real?
I have a suspicion this general knew exactly that documentation like that is probably of little use and that he was enforcing this "requirement" just to keep his superiors off his back for a while...
I'm so busted.  Why is there a monitor *under* the desk?
Wow. I think we talk about Israel because our billions of dollars in "aid" make us complicit.
I'm spent.
You can throw ad hominems at me all day if you want.  I stand by my statement that a responsible person takes responsibility for the conditions under which he penetrates another individual.
While I will admit I considered reporting it, it wasn't me. Sorry for your bad luck. I believe you when you say were unaware of the click fraud implications.
there's plenty of unpopular speech that doesn't involve molesting children
Still trying to figure it out myself.
hes referring to Israel right?
You do _ad hominem_ well.  Now answer the questions I pose.
That Trooper should have arrested all of them for being ass holes 
Or you can count the number of vowels in the word. More than one vowel in a row counts as 1. Kicked has two vowels, thus 2 syllables. Tears has 1 vowel block, `ea` counts as 1. Haiku has 2 vowel blocks `ai` and `u`.  There are some other rules/exceptions, but that's the gist of it. Helpful if you don't have a chin to touch.
It didn't used to. Check the Wayback machine archives.
I would wager that this is, in fact, the ultimate goal of the broadcast.
yeah... I thought this was pretty much common knowledge... let's explore the reasons for US involvement in WWI. I'm sure not many people know all the factors there.
I've heard rumors that the stats are no longer being updated.  This would seem to prove it true (I don't feel like saving/memorizing them, and checking later).
Damn straight. I can't remember ever having a Wiccan knock at my door in hope of converting me. For that reason alone, I think Wiccans are okay.
I thought the small animal life in water was called an orgy
I'm not complaining about anything. I'm pointing out that it's not the best thing since sliced bread. There is nothing special about it beyond it being a game system with decent graphics and a good game library.  The Wii rates higher for me because they actually decided to do something besides "better graphics than the last time". The problem with the Wii is that the graphics should have and could have been better and the online aspect is terrible.  If your concern is only graphics than your new best friend should be the PS3. In the end to be anything amazing you have to do more than be a compact computer with good graphics and thumb sticks.  There was a video on here of a kid using the wii remote to make a 3D (perceptually) display. That's the kind of shit that deserves an amazing rating.
Here's an even more [up to date map](http://goatse.cz/) of the area
it's certainly a record number of down mods!
"Nation of baby-killers."  Because no Arabs have blown up any Israeli babies in the course of this entire conflict?
what is the definition of deliverate?
happens at 2:30  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x-vX4sqMEFc  video will probably be taken down soon
Or chop off a limb.
Digg material on reddit front page.
&gt; I don't see how, if she made this oath, she might be compelled to violence.  As far as I understand from [greginnj's comment](http://reddit.com/info/6af21/comments/c03bd5v), one of the big things with Quakers is that they refuse to "swear" or "take oaths". They may affirm, but to them that's a significant distinction from swearing or oath-taking.  And as part of the issue with oath/affirm distinction (if I understand rightly) any kind of affirmation or statement of any kind has to be taken as seriously as the most serious oath by a non-Quaker (if that non-Quaker were the sort of person that took oaths seriously).  And because (presumably) Quakers are explicitly non-violent as well, she felt she could not "affirm" a statement that contained ambiguity - she *had* to clarify it to make it clear she was only committing to **non**-violently "support and defend the U.S. and state Constitutions against all enemies, foreign and domestic".
Though as someone else suggested, the woman's question "how do you deal with this" may have had the meaning "how do you deal with these decisions?" and may not have been a remark about he weight.  So perhaps it was the blogger who was prejudicial. 
Mcdonalds offered a free breakfast burrito to anyone (regardless of birthdate)... yay, junk food.
He's not stupid in this way. He just acts like this; it's actually a smart way to dodge a question.
Yes. A prequel please.
Happy birthday!
What is with the racism on YouTube's comments?  Seriously.
When i did it, the results said "yes 99.9%"  I wonder what the other vote was?
To be fair, breaking urinal etiquette is an appropriate reason to punch someone.
The US has done equally well with the indian lands as well then.
&gt; Or maybe it's whatever that is. &gt; /futurama reference  But seriously, why would anyone downvote that comment? It's factually accurate and readdresses the omission by the main comment as to who opposed the war from the beginning.
It was no mistake.
Libido, with an "i".  Perhaps your libido caused you to be confused with labia.
I'm trying to understand your point. You're saying that Israel did not seek this land out but it was instead given to them?
Heard of the Gaza disengagement?
I used to spell Nintendo as "Intendo".. I think my parents still have a christmas list with Intendo on it.
Aww hell. I was expecting middle aged chicks.
They are what we talk about when we discuss warrantless wireless taps.  Not to mention your entire rant I responded to was about Constitutional liberties.  But I'm do get a minor kick to see you squirm when you could just as easily concede the point.
There's a pretty significant "if" in the paragraph the link leads to (I won't call it an article because it ain't). "if" he did x, then it's a big deal. Well......the link doesn't lead us to any reasons to believe that x happened, so why should we believe that it did?  Yeesh, this is what's wrong with the Internet, and there's a story a couple spots higher about people getting their news from the internet instead of real news outlets?  We are doomed.
I trade mine in for Power Rangers.
That people are inherently good.
who watches this stuff?
Do you really believe he had no idea? This is just him saying he didn't have a canned response for this topic. He's smart enough not to open his big mouth about any topic unless he's gone over it with his staff.
So what does the fact that homosexuals can still be assets to society have to do with theories of racial superiority, you ask. Theories of racial superiority are rooted in the claim that genes are the determining factor in human evolution.  Obviously, most homosexuals will probably never pass on their genes.  Yet they can still invent, they can still develop social and scientific theories, and they can have a far bigger impact on future generations than just passing on some genes to a few kids. If you want to cling to your primitive belief in genetic superiority, then I suggest you devote all your time to mating as much as possible.  If you want to have a real impact, you're going to have to do it in the realm of ideas. Do you spend more time on reddit or in the bedroom?  You already know the answer.
Instead of an "organic" label, there needs to be a label that indicates how the animal used to make the product was treated (e.g. the size of its living area, what it was fed). The way you automatically assume "non-organic" means the animal is badly treated isn't fair to farmers who look after their animals.  I want animals to be treated well. I just hate this "us versus them" mentality that "organic" creates. The "non-organic" animals could have potentially be treated better but you're being misled by a label and your assumptions.
Who needs a gym?  Trade your car in for a bicycle and some running/walking shoes, for Chrissake!
So you would rather the state of Israel occupies vast areas of land and makes the Muslim inhabitants subservient to Jews?
&gt;I simply do not believe that property rights cannot coexist with respect for the well-being of animals.   They can: the [animal-welfarist](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Animal_welfare) view is one that seeks to minimize unnecessary harm to animals, without any philosophical recognition of inherent rights the animals might have.  It's definitely preferable to treat animals as nicely as possible, but within the welfarist view it's ok to keep eating them, making fur coats, testing shampoos and cosmetics, because these trivial, selfish, unnecessary wants trump the potential harm they do to animals.  But an *absolutist* view of property rights, as espoused by libertarian extremists, is incompatible with animal cruelty or welfare laws. If an animal is property, then any law dictating how that property can be treated is a state intrusion into the individual's freedom. If animals have rights, such as the right to not be maliciously treated, then they aren't property.  I'm not saying animal-welfare views are bad: any improvement to things as they are is better than nothing. I'm just disagreeing with you that the absolute property-rights philosophy means anything other than leaving it up to individual compassion.
Dude, I'm 23 and I had no idea.
&gt; Because you think that a required manual compilation step that leaves an artifact on your hard drive means that the JVM and CLR don't run bytecode the same way that the Perl 5 runtime does?  Actually, they don't run programs the same way that the perl 5 runtime does. They both have JITs (at least, the ones that most people use do).
Look at the comments in the linked Perl script. Priceless.
When boards/anything is stacked with spacers like that, only the first one needs to be broken in break the rest.
I swear, I thought I saw a quarter on the floor by your foot.  I wasn't loo-- BIFF!
Honey?  What?  Where's my super suit?  What?  Where - is - my - super - suit?  I, uh, put it away.  *Where*?  *Why* do you *need* to know?  I need it!  Uh-uh! Don't you think about running off doing no derrin'-do. We've been planning this dinner for two months!  The public is in danger!  My evening's in danger!  You tell me where my suit is, woman! We are talking about the greater good!  'Greater good?' I am your wife! I'm the greatest *good* you are ever gonna get! 
How about a zionist? I know there are a few of those apologists around reddit.
Horrible. Just horrible.  Freaking Nazis. The US is officially "gamer unfriendly." Corporate stooges. What would Ron Paul say?
Tony Stark is dope because he has a ton of cash, his company is a defense contractor and this means he can build the coolest shit ever. Even cooler stuff than Batman.  Oh, and he's an alcoholic. I remember seeing a story arc where he time-traveled? It was interesting stuff.  So to answer your question &gt;Why do people think Ironman is so dope?  Lots of firepower and explosions.
I roll my cat in oil paints and throw him at a canvas. 
How long before Redmond finally figures that the turd polish isn't actually working?..
Such eloquence and erudition! Your argument is so thorough it is absolutely unassailable! Clearly, you must know what you're talking about. I have met my match. Well done, sir.
Original material. Lived in Hazardville, CT., USA at the time. Was....6-7 years old a.t.t.
I don't avoid thinking about it, but I don't relish in the act of killing a living being. Normally, if most people had to kill their own food, they would approach the act with a sense of remorse.
hey, don't be a hater.  
Shameful yes, but only because this was a carefully stage managed publicity stunt from start to finish.   I caught a lot of the UK coverage on this. He spent his time in a bunker, the video seen on the news was set up for the camera crew they shipped in. They had footage of him firing an MG and "on patrol".   Normally when journalists are filming combat you get "shaky cam". They seek cover to a certain degree, as do the troops. However, when Harry was firing the mg at "targets" in the distance (which you never see), everyone else around was not in a combat stance.  There was no way this could stay secret. Not in a million years. Well, not in the last ten years at least, thanks to the internet. It was an open secret, the UK media were informed about it and asked not to report. This happens a lot in UK journalism, and they are mostly known in the industry. I used to share a flat with a BBC journalist and it was very interesting to hear about some stories weeks/months before they are announced officially. One that springs to mind was the John Leslie rape accusation, his name was out of the media until it was accidentally said on live TV one day, letting the cat out of the bag. It was in editable then just as it was here. PS I could tell you things about Gary Lineker ("Mr Clean") that you would not believe... ;-)  It's a brilliant PR coup. They get the best of both worlds; he does his propagandistic duty while being exposed to the minimum of risk. Those unfamiliar with monarchies might not know that there is a long history of princes going off to lead armies. The history of England revolves around it. They used to rally the troops and encourage people to join the army. In many ways this recent stunt is a nod back to that tradition, with the hope that it will have a similar effect.
I thought Vanilla Ice was a real gangster. And the mean streets of Carrollton Tx were best avoided by white people.
"If a government requires the support of oaths, it is a sign that it is not worth supporting, and ought not to be supported."  [Thomas Paine](http://shii.org/knows/Thomas_Paine)
GOATSE - DON'T CLICK! I did. :(
Yes. Why hold anyone accountable? That would make the rest of the unconvicted felons in the administration look like they were getting special treatment. We need blanket disregard for the law.
Oh I see "nervous system" now you're just being picky
&gt;I support New Deal programs  You're not a libertarian.  You are a liberal.
So after a less-than-mediocre retort, did you go home and work out?  Hope so...Austin is getting fatter and fatter all the time.  You fat bitches should just wear moo-moos, so men can subconsciously skip over you in a crowd when perusing for talent.
I don't think there is much difference between the map you linked to and the one in the article. You realize the one you linked to is the 1947 map and doesn't reflect the current boundaries?
It's a crucial error. She has a ton of drama over being called fat, &amp; calls a guy gay. 
why do i still see obama/hilary debates but no paul/McCain debates?
I've got ya one better - Mr. Anderson "wakes up" and realizes that everything in the first three movies was a dream.  Then, he gets a job as Keanu Reeves' stand-in for "Point Break 2: Electric Boogaloo," meets a girl played by Carrie-Anne Moss who looks exactly like Trinity and they marry and have babies.  In the epilogue of the film, many years have passed, and we see an older Mr. Anderson telling his children about the time he dreamt about saving the world and how he dreamt mommy died near the end of his dream even though he never knew mommy until after he became a Hollywood stand-in for Keanu Reeves.  Then, Agent Smith emerges from a hole he punches open from inside one of the children's ribcage  and exclaims, "It's not a dream, bitch!"  Everyone then flies around the room, punching the bejeebus out of each other, and the scene fades to black.   The end.   Can I have my six million dollar script fee now, please?
Oh fuck me. Can someone explain this?
so i guess that makes everything Israel does ok then.
http://youtube.com/watch?v=VnySqXboprc  here too.  Look who's running .. and it looks soo staged.
The area now known as Israel was 90% Arab at the time of the Balfour declaration. It was only after heavy settlement and immigration under the auspices of the British governorship that the Jewish population grew. No matter how you slice it, creation of  a Jewish homeland on somebody else land was not the morally right thing to do.  Of course, Israel now has a lot of Jews. So taking the land away from them now would be just as wrong as it was for Britain to take the land away from the Arabs originally.   As for where to put the Jewish homeland --- well, that's their problem. Their need for a homeland doesn't really justify stealing other peoples' land.  And it would've been one thing if the Jews had gone back and reclaimed the land themselves. They were driven out by force, and it would've been at some level morally acceptable to take the land back by force. But that's not what they did. Instead, they got the Western countries to intervene in their behalf, and of course the UK and the US have been saddled with that particular burden ever since.
Programmers: if you're doing something where you need to remember about leap years, it had damn well better be a date library.  If you're doing something else, just use a date library.  This guys should have done DateTime.Now.AddYears(1), for example.
Yeah the dynamics of hole depth/width get depressing rather quickly!  heh heh 
fake
"Running pick" - excellent metaphor.
percentage-wise, U.S. has probably done a lot worse. But some of the same exact dynamics are at play - a truce is agreed upon by the leadership of A and B.  Then some settlers from A break the truce by crossing onto B's land and setting up shop.  B complains, A does nothing to enforce its laws on its own people, and eventually some of B's people get sick of it and shoot/bomb/kill the settlers.  At this point A rolls in the tanks, claims the land as its own (to defend its people and borders), and a new line is drawn on the map. 
8(
So you're one of those people who frequents "comedy" clubs.
do you have any conservative friends?  They aren't all as close minded as you think.  The problem is that they are very practical and pragmatic and very very cautious about change.  Show them the positive side in dollars and cents and they tend to turn around easier.
nah, the "inside job" theory is too crazy. I prefer the one where some extremists living in some caves over in Afghanistan sent 19 dudes, mostly Saudis, to learn how to fly air planes (even though some of them clearly sucked) over here in the US and then had them fly giant passenger liners hundreds of miles without anyone realizing they were of course or anyone at least sending interceptors to stop them because they didn't know if it was a real world threat or a training mission. Yeah, it was clearly them, because we are so free and they just hate that.
What makes a cow's life better than that of a stalk of corn?
Shooter was probably hired by Juvenile so that Juvenile wouldn't have to pay child support.
No fat bitches!
I like cheese.
Think of the children!
That was my thought too.  Even after all this time, after we've killed well in excess of a million Iraqis, the very Jewish Hollywood finds the need to further demonize those pesky Muslims.
With Larry Craig prowling you can never be too careful.
How was your meat treated?  Do you know? Do you care?  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SWmAJlwLnQI
The 2nd and 3rd movies should have never been made; they were god-awful. No 4th one for the love of god.
Because all human beings are peaceful individuals at heart, and never hate each other's guts to such a degree that they want an entire race wiped off of the face of the earth.
IMO she should have shut the fuck up years ago.
now, i voted you up
Looks like someone is banking on the awesomeness that is Team Fortress2.
Yeah, and we're sick of fucking Batman.
* Marijuana  * My car (98 Subie LegacyGT)  * Guitar  * Beer  * Clothes  * Marijuana  * Beer  * Marijuana Just to list a few
like clicking those up down arrorws
With regards to ridesharing: most people aren't coming from or going to the same place(s). The most efficient ridesharing we ever had was when hitchhiking was considered OK. Unfortunately, due to our fear mongering media, hitchhiking has been ruined.
and then proceeds to make an ad with the same premise
Declassified: Did the hot chick Intentionally Lure the violent criminal into raping her by wearing provocative clothing?
&gt; The question I'd really want to ask a supporter of Palestine is this; where on this map would YOU propose to put the Jewish homeland?  How about the 1967 level?  I think your claim is that the current map is OK because of the spoils of war. Doesn't that ignore the illegal acquisitions since 1967?
Watch the trailer.  I love the scene at the end where he kicks in the afterburners in his hands and breaks the sound barrier.
She spends her free time reading recipes in bookstores, and writing down the ones she likes.  She read a recipe the day she wrote the story that contained the expression "en flambe" and she just **had** to use it.
&gt;As we all know, black people are black as a result of poor decisions, whole fat people are born that way.  What about half fat people?
old picture is old
Most of the wall (95%) is a fence which can be easily moved in regards to future peace deals.
What the hell do they need a homeland for and who are we to give it to them? They are a minority in a region which is largly incompatible with their presence. Why not give them some of that evangelical land down South, since these Israeli-supporting Southerners seem to be most compatible with them. I am tired of my tax dollars funding some fanatical religious state that has such egregious human rights violation. The Israeli problem is not the problem of America, nor has it ever been. Helping Israel has only cost us resources and increased hostility across the Muslim world for us.
Which Neil had almost nothing to do with, since he was off writing the catastrof*ck that was Beowulf
Yes, and Robin answers it.  A lot.  Batman's big, red, pulsing phone.
I'm sorry but when he glares into camera and then it cuts to a picture of him after he's "calmed down" and smiling again, I felt like I was watching an SNL sketch or something.
shouldnÂ´t we christians now like meet and scream slogans and burn things?
No it doesn't.
I bet fatty got 5 double whoppers *with cheese* to celebrate.
Do Obama supporters even bother with reading his platform?  http://www.barackobama.com/issues/foreignpolicy/#21st-century-military  Increase. Not replace. Increase. There's a consistent headcount in place for recruiting, those have died or injured to the point of EAS will be accounted for and recruited properly. But this policy is calling for an increase of that total headcount by 10%.  After 5 years of war, what needs to be invested are after-action training, VA support, and equipment rehab, not bringing online another 91,000 more personnel. What are they going to be used for if not more war?  And as for the point of my original post: everyone is so trigger happy at adding more to government. Why? Will your life really be all that better with a behemoth that costs more than $3.1 trillion dollar and requires borrowing from foreign countries?
stay on reddit all night
Many who claim to be Christians are not Christians at all.
 John Connor: We've got company.  Miles Dyson: Police?  Sarah Connor: How many?  John Connor: Uh, all of them, I think.
Let me guess.. she told you your face would get wet, but don't stop licking?
Happy Birthday!
The question the article addresses is this; if both he and she are drunk beyond the point of reasoned consent, but still manage to have sex... did rape occur? Who raped who? Did they both rape each other? The feminist view is that only men can be rapists, and that it necessarily follows that he raped her, even if in fact she was the sexual initiator.
i'm picturing something more along the lines of  assorted shiny blue objects and various freshly killed animals.
At age 18 I believed, that I had a vast array of knowledge and probably wouldn't need much more.  Experiences (travel, relationships, new jobs etc) would be fun but not add much except fun and excitement.  
Very cool Buck. And in related news, I became a dad at 6:55 CST this morning. 
Yeah, no problem. The article itself decent. I just wish people wouldn't sensationalize stuff so much.
It sounds minor but it would still breach her religious beliefs.  Quakers usually dont parse words or play lawyer tricks with the wording if she feels that she is "swearing" no matter the form its done.  Of course this doomed the Cathars and many other more Gnostic sects in the past but its not an uncommon Christian belief just mostly a dead one.  I say usually because I do believe Nixon was a Quaker but that just proves he was an american president, "I go to church, and make great business connections."
As has to be said every time this issue comes up, the Constitution's ban of *ex post facto* laws prevents the government from making an act that wasn't a crime when it was committed illegal after the fact. Making something that was a crime legal is perfectly fine and is done all the time.  Let's focus on the real issue here: There is a good reason why warrants are required for searches. The government told the telecommunications companies to let them search without a warrant. The companies agreed. By doing this, they broke laws and should be punished for it. The government should also be punished for attempting to violate our Fourth Amendment rights.
So, since Hamas is trying to kill Israeli civilians, Israel decides to block food supplies to Gaza, with the effect of what, killing civilians maybe?
Dear god, no! I wouldn't wish that on my worst enemy..
I love it.  Anyone who'd get involved with Rachel Marsden has some serious lack of judgement.
Isreal kills 30 people in 2 days and they kill 1 person with 130 rockets, which shows they probably don't want to shoot at people on purpose. soldiers used to not want to kill people if they didn't have to.
Goddamn that guy's good with retorts.
She couldn't be compelled **by others**, but that wouldn't be necessary - she'd be compelled by her own words.  If she'd "affirmed" her agreement to the unmodified text, she'd feel obliged to "defend the U.S. and state constitutions against all enemies foreign and domestic" and she would *also* feel obligated to use violence if necessary to defend those poor frail helpless constitutions.  The extraordinary unlikelihood of this ever actually playing out in real life is a side issue. I think it's fairly fundamental that Quakers really really don't want to agree to something that could lead to a conflict in their belief system.  And while I enjoy mocking religionists as much as the next redditor :), I have to say that "strict nonviolence" and "always say what you mean and mean what you say" are actually very admirable non-theistic principles. Good on her for sticking to her (entirely metaphorical, apparently) guns. :)
I would say money sent to China via the market helps bring about the atrocities in Darfur... 
Then you owe reparations to The Vietnamese, most of Central America, The East Timorese, Iraqis and every other dirty little massacre that the US has been involved in since the 20s. Still, Here's a take on the costs of this war by Joseph Stiglitz http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2008/feb/28/iraq.afghanistan . He has a Nobel prize in economics. You don't. The reason the situation is different now, is that America is broke. When a wave of banks started going under recently, Northern Rock (in the UK) was bailed out by the state, The NZ versions were bailed out by the state... The US was unable to do the same, so Citigroup is now owned by the Middle East. Devaluation isn't happening. What is happening is US assets passing into foreign hands. Oh, and on a moral level, you still owe reparations to a fairly large number of foreign nations as well.
Post more pictures of cats with funny text on them.  People love that shit.
Looks like your inner child *grew* up.
A big list of demos and shareware? Fail.
And you're reading comments?  FOOL!
send me a picture and I'll try
1) using databases
People are genuinely upset that this person is getting all of these magical "karma points". It's too pathetic to be funny.   
She spends too much time reading cookbooks and not enough time reading gay porn.
or anyone they want to marry, because it is their choice.
The area described as "Palestine" in the map was never an independent nation.  Part of it was Jordan and part of it was Egypt. These countries lost their pieces of "Palestine" when they attacked invaded (or massed their forces for an attempted invasion) Israel.  
Probably because she's apparently fat, and she'd probably take offense if someone described her as the fat chick, so she doesn't want to call him the gay guy for fear of being offensive and hypocritical, but she still wants to explain that this guy is gay. So she then calls him "en flambÃ©", ignoring the fact that she'd probably hate being referred to as the delightfully plump chick, thus making her offensive and hypocritical.  Admittedly, the woman in line was likely being a bitch, but having said that, I think it ought to be socially acceptable to refer to people as being fat. Frankly, the fact that people take offense just encourages the idea that being fat is worse than being thin. Kudos on promoting your own demise, lady.
Ah, masculinity in all it's alleged rational glory.
&gt; Wash and cut the tubers  NOOOOO!!!!
&gt;/\*(God I hate you).\*/ ... whoops! I'm sorry, was that out loud?  fixed.
And women who don't know how to accessorize.
old dupe.
Why isn't anyone calling out this absurd claim that a "majority" of Democrats prefer Hillary? Obama leads in the [popular vote](http://www.realclearpolitics.com/epolls/2008/president/democratic_vote_count.html), even if you include *both* Florida and Michigan (where Obama wasn't even on the ballot). Obama also beats her in [national polls](http://www.realclearpolitics.com/epolls/2008/president/us/democratic_presidential_nomination-191.html) for the Democratic nomination.
its one but "iron" could be two in some dialects (british+irish english)
&gt; It's much more fun to bash Israel than to talk about...  Just like people like to call corporations evil and ignore the services they provide us. You don't hear anyone praising the RIAA or ATT for what they have offered to us. Clearly these entities (including Israel) have good aspects or they wouldn't be in existence. However the obvious injustices they heap upon us are what makes them the center of discussion.  &gt; if you want to look at a Palestinian land grab, look at Jordan.   How about we look at both? Trying to excuse Israel of it's atrocities because of a greater atrocity seems a weak defense.
I think you mean Aryan Givers, its a tad more accurate.
E.g. by means of a tugboat :p  Besides, they are only semi-blind during a mission, to avoid detection. Back home they can  actually surface and/or operate the sonar.
I was really hoping for ?
Dude, how'd you get into my house?!
I'm a socialist libertarian.  I support abortion except late term unless incest or rape, drug legalization, subsidized education, homeschooling (I oppose government-mandated laws like No Child Left Behind and Nazi Germany-style anti-home schooling state laws), environmental protection and alternative energy development (however I'm a skeptic of global warming and oppose carbon tax), trust busting and regulating labor &amp; corporate to protect human rights (oppose hostile monopoly, mandatory and massive deregulation for profit gouging and human rights, animal and environmental abuse), abolish IRS, ATFE &amp; Federal Reserve, reform or eliminate FBI and CIA, repeal virtually all laws that are fascistically draconian, release some prisoners on merit and behavior basis (mostly victims of the drug war and police/justice system corruption), advocate vegetarian option in school lunch programs, protection of New Deal programs such as Social Security and Public Utility Holding Act of 1935 (latter now repealed in 2006), declassification of *all* White House and U.S. govt records up until 2000 regardless of living persons involved in historical incidents, advocate vigorous prosecution and execution of prominent persons on proven charge of high treason (ex-presidents, Neocons, govt officials and spies that severely compromise national security), outlawing of participation in known secret societies and treasonous think tanks (Bilderberg Group, Trilateral Commission, 300 Commission, Council on Foreign Relations, etc), reconstruction of Washington D.C. to eliminate the [occult symbolism](http://www.wakeupfromyourslumber.com/node/5703), partial rollback of existing federal gun laws to uphold 2nd Amendment, elimination of "nanny state" ordinances and laws in every state, eradication of foreign influence, fiscal management of total national debt now numbering nearly [54 trillion dollars](http://www.financialsense.com/editorials/turk/2008/0109.html) down to zero and raise surplus, complete rejection of and reversing the US's recognition of Israel, prioritizing of NASA and other scientific expeditions for the benefit of mankind and release classified US govt documentation on lunar landing as a Cold War relic hoax and tax fraud, etc.  I'd like to think of myself as a liberal person, but not extremist like imposing totalitarian Soviet-style communism. It's about being a *progressive* -- mix of Theodore Roosevelt and Andrew Jackson.  Edit: I'm absolutely against amnesty for illegals. Deport them all gradually. Eliminating illegal immigration crossing can be solved by installing the machine gun nests and mines by the enforcers at the borders. I support death penalty for heinous crimes and treason.
yeah, what he said. All of em are lying bastids, just like the doom sayers of the last two years regarding the housing/mortgage scandal and meltdown. Lies, all lies. This guy is just as bad with his web bot predictions: http://urbansurvival.com/week.htm
In the United States one does typically get legal counsel, a council would be nice though.
&gt; apparently I'm too good a writer to be telling the truth.  This reeks of fake outrage at being called on making shit up.
*NINE THOUSAND!!!!!!!!!!*
hey! i'm calling homeland secutity.  i jest.
I would rather that the Muslim nations make peace with the notion that there is a Jewish state in the area. The "vast areas" you speak of are tiny compared to the Muslim world. Muslim citizens of Israel are not second class, they can vote, have full freedom of worship, etc. Those are not rights offered to Jews in Muslim lands.  Both sides need to find a way to peace. Israel should give back almost all of the West Bank (keeping East Jerusalem and the area around it) and do something reasonable with the Golan. And Hezbollah has to stop attacking and Hamas has to stop attacking. 
Whatever gave you that impression? The article itself stating it?
pedantic linguists  always answering questions  that were never asked
But whose genitals?
While I was a teen, I though oral sex was the only kind and girls could get pregnant from it.
yeah, that's why I included the wikipedia link too.
I would guess the exposure was about 7h in length. Am I right?
AT&amp;T isn't the only company that did this. If you're trying to take a stand, I hope you fulfill all your telecommunications needs via Qwest.
But... it was an interactive online poll!
I think that you are wrong since Europeans talk pretty much the same way and they give aid to the Palestinians. And I think that you probably don't think twice about the money you personally send to China or Saudi which use that money to do far worse than Israel does.
You know what's really messed up?  if you search for "adwords tou"  guess what you get...
Jesus isn't anywhere near a lot of things that get attributed to Him.
Wow.  I guess I'm lucky with my piddling $800 balance.
time elapse
So basically what your saying is that Ahamdinejad would treat the Jews the same as Israel is treating the Palestinians right now?  Fistly I think you need to look up Jewish-Iranian relationships, you might be pleasantly surprised. Secondly are - I suspect - trying to turn this into an anti-semite discussion.  Point is, Iran was vilified internationally because of the misquote. Day after the misquote, Ariel Sharon called for Iran to be banned from the UN, so I guess what im trying to say is, why should Israel get a free pass for basically threatening to 'wipe Palestine off the map'?
Yep. Myself, I still Hope Gore has a Change of mind about not running. Yes he can!
Reddit hates fat people.  Well, hell, everyone does.  But Reddit really does.
AXE is shit btw. It says "not for intimate use" on the can. Fuck them.
It is a war. The U.S. engaged in unrestricted submarine warfare in WWII to starve out Japan. Israel is not exactly under and obligation to feed the country that attacks it. How about ask Hamas to take responsibility for their actions.
Gaza buddy.
close to failing? "close"? what mission?
strawman through and through.  If a guy purposely gets drunk so he can make the "but I was drunk too" claim, he's still a rapist.  If they're both drunk but still able to say yes or know and he still has to intimidate, coerce, or force, he's still a rapist.
&gt;Makes me sometimes wish I were a dog.  If you were a dog you wouldn't piss on her leg.  You'd shove your nose up her fat ass and wag your tail and pant wetly when she did the same to you.
job well done by my book
I did response. Bumped made false claims and I pointed that out.
the letter sounds condescending or at least demanding to me. no sympathy for writing a letter like that:  &gt; *I would be displeased* if this were to happen to me......  Does this guy think he's a klingon or something??? XD  &gt; Having put the above information forward, it is logical to conclude that I would be most disappointed should I receive a different console with a plain white case in return.  Doesn't even offer to pay more for the extra care, only a demand.  all the best comments here are downmodded.
That makes zero sense. If male reviewers accepted 21% of female-authored manuscripts, how can it be said that male reviewers do not discriminate?  Maybe that was your point. Hard to tell as you left zero commentary.  (edit: I *so* deserve a karmic spanking for this post. Reddit justice.)
Muslims got angry when Jews bought land as well. Muslims got angry when uppity Jews refused to stay in their place. But you refuse to learn any history.
I can't believe you actually hold such a ludicrous opinion.
The first map in the "article" is simply false, the second has the borders in the wrong place.
You know, I never would have considered propane. "It explodes and you want me to pressurize it??" Thanks for the link.
OH NOES!!! HE COULD DIE!!  Seriously no one should care about this, yeah its gross, but not newsworthy
Last I checked, the Muslims were doing the same exact thing, what is your point?
Well apparently its not that easy with the U.S education system and the economic sitaution. Especially with the secret out of school programs the U.S creates to give unfair advantages. 
Frog DNA.
When I was very young, someone taught me about the Bernoulli principle, and explained that that was how airplanes flew.  It was a fascinating explanation but neglected to mention the role (or even the presence) of engines.  So for a long time I believed airplanes drove really fast on the runway, were projected into the air by the Bernoulli principle, and described a perfect parabola through the sky under their own inertia before falling to their destination.  I remember thinking the pilot must have extremely precise control over his takeoff speed, since if it were just a little too fast or too slow the plane would miss the runway halfway across the country.
Ze voman by herself is not a science person.
[I think its pretty close a tie for the percentage of indian land](http://nationalatlas.gov/printable/images/pdf/fedlands/fedlands3.pdf)  Nice description of the sequence of events.
&gt;If she's passed out then it **is** rape.  Fixed that for you.  Unconcious people cannot consent.  They can't say know.  **It's always rape if the person is asleep**  Because they can't change their mind.  If you can't instantly change you're mind, then you're just not consenting.  Period.  Nothing gray about it.
You need, a fucking diploma, to have the right to repair stupid cars but to raise a child, you only need a dick and a cunt.
He must be hungry for more freedoms.
Brilliant reframe. Brilliant. About time progressives started exposing these fearmongers and power-grabbers for who and what they are.
Wind up your arm...
Comments like this are baffling to me. How can a country that is getting billions of dollars in aid and military support from the U.S. be victims? Is it not obvious to you that Israel is just a fancy western foothold on top of the biggest oil reserves in the world?  Shouldn't the Jewish settlers take a lesson from their favorite text and give the baby up before Solomon kills it?
&gt; I think Perl's syntax for nested data constructions like a matrix is awesome:  &gt; $matrix[2][3]  Sigh.
I've never heard Foreign Key called a check constraint.  It's a Foreign Key constraint.  Check constraints are declared with the keyword 'Check'.  And yes, they are ignored by MySQL.  They are parsed for compatibility's sake, but they are not checked with DML statements.  This may have changed in 5.1.  I haven't kept up on it since 5.0.  
They did. But "get along" does not mean "continue to act as second class citizens they way that all allowed non-Muslims are supposed to act". They were uppity and insisted on equality and that infuriated people. 
Let me guess... he is... by any chance... black? 
Glacier Punch. That is the shit. I've got to use that one on my son.
I'm an aspiring director. Gimme some contacts. Right now.
i like to click them twice for extra points
So if my state wanted to put [George Carlin's Seven Words](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=377373610287662297&amp;q=george+carlin+seven+words&amp;total=21&amp;start=0&amp;num=100&amp;so=0&amp;type=search&amp;plindex=0) on our quarter D.C. thinks that's acceptable?  I assume not, because they are seven vulgar words.  But now, where do we draw the line? I guarantee I can offend you worse than those words without using vulgarity.  It becomes subjective.  Do we draw the line at, nothing controversial unless 1 in 500 or so feels it's important enough to make people talk about over something entirely irrelevant (U.S. coins)?  Or do we draw it just a *little* further and mandate that we have nothing controversial period unless a majority of the U.S. population, i.e. the people who the coins belong to, agree?  As a Colorado resident, I don't want D.C.'s political agenda on my quarters.  There's enough political *bullshit* surrounding money, we don't need to print it directly onto the money.  Someone above mentioned that the founding fathers didn't intend for people to live in D.C., which isn't a state.  You of course want to live there anyway, and you do.  But this doesn't change the fact that the rights guaranteed to U.S. citizens were under the assumption that you didn't intend to live there.  This isn't some conspiracy to destroy your rights, you've got the entire rest of the country to live in.  Including areas that are very accessible to D.C.  Whatever, I couldn't be happier for you if they do decide to give you representatives and whatnot - the point is, *keep your bullshit off my money*.  This is why we put presidents who have long been dead on money.  Nobody remembers how many people they pissed off or how much of our country they fucked up.
Nice.  Good find.
maybe the manuscripts sucked and the male reviewers threw out trash. downmod lame
If the burglar is hit, the chances of him getting a shot off are rather low. Even if he does do it, the chances of it hitting anyone are even lower. Low enough that I'd prefer them over the chance that I'd be found and shot before the cops arrived. There's a problem with hiding, you know: Most of the places a person would hide are also places where people might store valuables.  Even if the burglar isn't alone, a homeowner has _all_ the advantages in that scenario. He's on the defensive, knows the layout of the house, and as long as he's in a position to protect the inhabited areas of the house, he need not move. The odds are heavily stacked in his favor.  If the guy downstairs panics, well, good for him. He's probably going to run away rather than panic and run UP the stairs to the area where his buddy got blown away. That means one bad guy has been killed, and the other is no longer a threat.  If he's pissed and wants revenge, he's going to have to walk into the line of fire, spot the defending homeowner, aim, and fire. All the homeowner has to do is adjust his aim and fire.  Bear in mind, this is assuming only _one_ of the residents is armed. That may not be the case.  If you prefer to run and hide, then by all means, have at it! There are those of us who prefer to be more active in our defense, and that's our right.  Personally, I can tell you that in my living space, armed defense is the only way to go. The entire place could be searched in under 15 minutes, police response is abysmal, and there's only one entrance/exit that anybody could really use. Hiding isn't an option, but if I catch someone coming in, they're going to have a real hard time of getting into a position where they can take an aimed shot at me.
So much for the rule of law.
&gt;The usual understanding of property is that it ascends pyramidally up into the heavens and down into the earth.   Actually there is a height limit but it's much higher than any tree could grow.
The author makes an excellent case here, and it warrants the reopening of the 9/11 investigation.
I love this: "Judge Raoul Neave said: 'This is exactly the sort of behaviour that makes people afraid to go to town'."
Just stop this immature crap.  You're so obnoxious that  you're actually making me feel sympathy for Scientology.
Speaking from the experience of working as a barista, server, and other "tip" jobs, I absolutely relied on tips to get me through between paychecks. If those jobs didn't have tips, I wouldn't work them, perhaps work on getting a higher paid job (which I eventually did). Point being, I suppose, a good tip day can pay for 2 days of ramen noodles and peanut butter and jelly sandwiches and your paycheck can be use to pay off your art school student loans.
i say we let the government censor and control it all. The government is always right. right?
Sing it with me folks:  You'll know they are Christians by their love.
I was unwelcome at DailyKos due to their "fancy being free-thinker yet part of Establishment" sticker, so forget about being a Democrat.   I agree with Ron Paul on eliminating some departments, like Dept of Ed. 
Yeah, some are just internet trolls!
Hey, you've proven you just hate women several times just in the last month with some hypocritical and nonsensical postings and comments.  Nothing ad hominem about it.
There have been [plenty](http://www.uscrusade.com/forum/config.pl/noframes/read/1372) of U.N. resolutions against Israel.  The number is actually surprising given the U.S. has veto power.  Oh and if anyone finds such a list with dates, feel free to link it.
Why does that matter?
I agree with the first map, it seems weird. The second plus the third maps though are encompassed in your map. Yours is a two phase map and the article simply broke theirs out into two separate maps.
Yeah, next time civilization needs to be built, we'll call you for interior design pointers. kthx.
god
Logically, it means that the female reviewers were the ones with the bias: a bias in favour of manuscripts written by women that would otherwise have been rejected if submitted anonymously.
Iron Man has been around for a good deal of time. His origins have been retold a few times, originally he was injured in Vietnam, then in the Gulf War, and the latest retelling made it Afghanistan. It has more to do with showing Tony Stark being where there is a war to help explain the origins of Iron Man.   In response to nokilli, the writers for the comic book choose the bad guys, not really a Jewish Hollywood influenced decision.  Just wanted to add a little background that does justify the choice a bit. It seems to me to be more about putting Stark in a situation that has actual ties to the real world.
&gt;Apartheid is against the law  What law is this?   BTW, it is funny that you then complained that I don't answer the question and you give this crap. It was the Muslim law for centuries that made Jews second class citizens. You think that it is just fine for Jews to accept those laws, but give this incoherent "apartheid" nonsense.
You know, labels like that could get complicated because:  "A type of trans fat occurs naturally in the milk and body fat of ruminants (such as cows and sheep) at a level of 2â€“5% of total fat." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trans_fat
Obviously your goals in a dog's life are radically different from mine.  I like revenge without consequences.  You, apparently, enjoy bestiality.
I believed in God.
They *do* have reliable meth connections, tho.  And a lot of them aren't as old as they look.
Half Life 2 for sure!
That quote was automatically read in my head in a George W. Bush voice. More accurately, in Jon Stewart's George W. Bush voice.
Well I don't think you can smash it's face in. But it is certainly exceptable to chase the animal around the house with a remote control car.
You'd be SHOCKED (or not?) at what should be common knowledge but isn't.  But sigh, the empire relies on ignorance to keep the gears of war grinding. -------- Bodies -&gt; War Machine -&gt; Profit !
Relative humidity is water's partial vapor pressure divided by it's saturated vapor pressure.  And technically for it to rain the formation of clouds necessitates a local 100 % humidity.
Yeah, the only stones you move are the stoners you work with.
I think things might be improved if the testing system for literature were changed.  Maybe, instead of quizzes, have in-class discussions with minimal teacher involvement (just to seed discussion topics).  Give full points to everyone, and then, at the end of class, subtract points for non-participation.  Also, instead of a "memorize minutia" exam, give a range of topics on which the students can write an essay.  I mean, if you're studying literature, you should be expected to write as well as read.  I'm not a teacher or education major, and I haven't had to read anything for school since my days in college freshman English classes (though I **do** read for pleasure), so I'm not sure if this type of system would be workable, but I just think that students could be led into actually *enjoying* reading if you could use it to spark interesting discussions rather than forcing them to memorize specific details.
Indoline dyes improve efficiency of solar cells
An interesting phenomenon - after seeing this fifteen times it actually became funny.  Oh wait, I got it wrong.  It's actually less funny...
what a fat bitch, seriously.
Well you have the 1948 Arab-Israeli War http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1948_Arab-Israeli_War in which the Arab nations did invade Israeli. But just because you were invaded doesn't mean to get someone else's land. By that logic Japan would be part of the US.  Then there's the Six-Day War in 1967, in which Israeli attacked first. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Six-Day_War  Followed by the Yom Kippur War in 1973 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Yom_Kippur_War in which Egypt was reclaiming Sinai (illegally occupied by Israeli, belongs to Egypt) and Syria the Golan Heights (illegally occupied by Israeli, belongs to Sinai).  Many agree that what the Palestinians lost in 1948 is lost forever. But the general global consensus (including the UN) is that Israeli should return to the 1967 border. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_Nations_Security_Council_Resolution_242  But that's not good enough for Israeli. They keep expanding settlements in the West Bank and Golan Heights. Parts of the Israeli West Bank barrier cuts into the West Bank. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israeli_West_Bank_barrier  Israeli's occupation and expansion into the Occupied Territories is just illegal and immoral. Their belief that Palestinian land is theirs is backed by their religion, which by its very nature can't be argued against.  That in and of itself is bad. What's worse is that the US heavily backs Israel, so now we're dragged into their quest of expansion. And with that comes the anger and frustration of the Palestinians directed (and rightly so) towards us.
I think I see where the misunderstanding is.  When I mean thin air, I don't mean that the bank printed money.  I mean that they pay for the treasuries with a computer entry that has no backing.  I did some research and I think I was still correct.  Look at these articles:  http://www.themoneymasters.com/faqs.htm#q5  http://wfhummel.cnchost.com/moneyinmotion.html  Banks do have a reserve account with the Fed but when the Fed "buys" treasuries from banks, it simply credits their account with a computer entry and thus "creates" money in the system.
Don't taunt the Predators... those guys can turn invisible and skin you alive before you can say "Oh fuck!"
There's almost no proper scientific evidence that organic food is better than non-organic.  More importantly, the term 'organic' in chemistry means any carbon compound, so anything from oil to styrofoam is organic.  I support the idea that producers should have the right to publish that their product have a particular quality or ingredient, and that when they do so they must be honest.  Then particular consumers can choose those products.  I also don't believe these things should be compulsory.  Many foods consists of thousands of different chemicals and it would limit food supply to only the large of corporates if producers had to declare every possibly known ingredient just because some people have a particular pop-fear of it.
The network perceives the industrial media as damage and routes around them.
There's even a class "People who refuse to use the word Ajax". I've always thought everyone besides me has given in to the web-two-oh-shitheads' immature and ridiculous terminology, but apparently I'm not alone after all.
I'm willing to bet Obama would have voted the same way as Hillary if he had been there too.
And there's nothing wrong with saying that she's a douchebag for doing so. It just so happens to be a fundamental right granted to us by the First Amendment.
Now it all makes sense. 
I am getting tired of hearing about all this experience of hers. It's experience in failure is what it is. I'll give her points on her experience as a first lady, but on the other hand if the red phone rings at 3am who do you want to answer, Laura Bush or Obama?  Hillary has experience in failure, that doesn't qualify her for much.
And the settlements are overwhelmingly wrong things to do. If Hamas and Hezbollah would stop trying to kill Israeli civilians and concentrated on objecting to the settlements they would find that they had the majority of Israel's population on their side.
&gt; Ben and Jerry's Ice Cream label their pints with a notice that their product does not contain bovine growth hormone.  They can't make any claims about what's in the product, because the end products are identical. I think you mean "not from cows treated with rBST", which is the common phrasing.
Probably his 7 year old grandkid explained the "intrawebby" to grandpa in terms that he could understand.   Hopefully it'll stick.
&gt;*It's very hard* to fight genetics in some but not all cases  Yes it's very hard, but it's not impossible. To gain weight drink a lot of beer. Jeez, what kind of a redditor are you? :P
Saturday Night Live should be suing the Clinton campaign for copywright infringement over this ad.  Bush (Dana Carvey) - "Because you see, this election is about who can take the heat, who you want there when that secured phone in the White House rings at 3 AM."
in the last 2 days Isreal has killed 30 people in Gaza, with 4 children and...well.. one baby. In the missile firings at Isreal that have sparked this conflict, Arabs shot 130 rockets, killing one man. This is genocide.
squirrel
*Inflation is the opium of the people.  And this is precisely its political function.  It is because inflation confuses everything that it is so consistently resorted to by our modern 'planned economy' governments... Like every other tax, inflation acts to determine the individual and business policies we are all forced to follow.  It discourages all prudence and thrift.  It encourages squandering, gambling, reckless waste of all kinds.  It often makes it more profitable to speculate than to produce.  It tears apart the whole fabric of stable economic relationships.  Its inexcusable injustices drive men toward desperate remedies.  It plants the seeds of fascism and communism.  It leads men to demand totalitarian controls.  It ends invariably in bitter disillusion and collapse.*  - Henry Hazlitt, "Economics in One Lesson"
I was expecting either something like [this](http://scubasocal.files.wordpress.com/2007/08/enlightenment.jpg) or goatse.
Let me guess, your getting your news from Fox?
Don't you need a period after "( Layer.prototype.setloader )"?
The difference is, the war on drugs is justified.
I'm more afraid of getting hit by a drunk driver than I am of getting shot and I live in Richmond.
Lobbyists represent real people?  No lobbyist represents me.
paintshopproed!
is it appropriate to use the n word here?
Kind of amazing how out of an Austin non-chain bookstore full of people, the only two morons there manage to connect right away.
someone should deploy killer robots against fox news... fuckin ridiculous.
Oh man, that's from Ashley's old-west style porn! I just finished watching that!
Must be God. There's no other logical explanation. 
Have you ever played the Grand Theft Auto series?
wow now this is what I call Karma whoring. He has the #1 post of all time on Reddit now: http://reddit.com/browse?sort=top&amp;t=all And I think this might be the first submission that might break the 3000 upmod barrier. Just for that he has my vote, and happy bday :&gt;
In response, Canonical slashed Ubuntu's price in half. It is now $0.  Oh, wait...
Yeah, I guess I'm pro ideas more than anything. And I recall a time when the flag didn't stand for bombing and torturing and this and that. In my mind, it stands for liberty and peace and prosperity. So, I guess I don't mind flags. 
I thought that the world grew up hearing about peace because they planned to achieve it. They don't.
who cares if our meat is cute. I don't eat it for it's looks I eat it for it's taste.
Sorry, that's actually the older trailer. There is a newer one that just came out. But can't find it on apple.com yet. I am still waiting for it.
No, but it changes perspective on the conflict. If you see a hundred million Arabs on one side and 3 million Israelis you have one idea, if you see it as 3 million Israelis against 3 million Palestinians you have a different view. The creation of a Palestinian national identity was a great victory for the PLO and a big part of the *reason* for their terrorism campaign. They were terrorists because it would provoke Israel and the reaction would unify the "Palestinians". 
All I know recently about Mr.Walkers Crisps is that he got divorced recently 
Because some people are trying to unfairly tie him to islam and the middle east. saying "barak hussein obama" is fine, saying barak HUSSEIN THE MUSLIM TERRORIST OSAMA, err OBAMA is not.
thanks Yoda.
And quite a few anti-Semites.
I was a 7th grade student when I had this great idea to put two magnets on a platform and reverse two on a spindle to create energy. Yea,.. hello electric engine.  I thought I had a ground breaking discovery though.
Then your platforms are linux/solaris/freebsd.
It'll make your boobs grow. C'mon. Everyone is doing it. You know you want to.
Draconian, but needed. How about when they get down to a population that their country can sustain, then they talk about having more babies?
 "".join(chr(int(i, 16)) for i in barcode.split())   '@\n\x1c\rAA-12731-12157-10080-8349-118-521279856-37688412512516-7011489-66-1285212172102-60-3410791-416449-1106124-83-8453-15-117-36-6453-15-117-36-6453767959117593212726112-9874-1076884-15-82-1-1674-7155111-127-78-704-10782-65-116-12853-15-119-84-63124-4181121-99126814-86-8753-15-117-36-6417-722393-5285-344039239286-2863-2853-15-117-36-6453-15-117-36-8611495111-981594-111-73-318611495-10499-2890-39-471101149590-25-7580-89-47-123-90101892998-1205311278-1203253-15-117-36-6453-15-119-84-63-116113103-877653-15-119-84-6211229-123-862990-39-70-47-99-5842110564111861539-10816-15-117-36-8611495-22617653-15-117-36-643213'
Yom Kippur War was Egypt and Syria attempting to reclaim their land (Sinai and Golan Heights). They unfortunately lost to Israeli's superior US funded military.
I thought I *just barely* could see really faint monofilament strings that supported those little hovering bee like bugs.  Except they were on the bottom side.  When I was older I was puzzled that I couldn't see it anymore. Also, my Dad once taught me that bugs bite.  I tore around the side of the house one day crying and screaming "bugs bite!".  A Monarch butterfly was chasing me.  After that we moved to the more sophisticated taxonomy: "*Some* bugs bite."  
No they won't unless it improves their bottom line. 
&gt;while increasing the birds' cognitive abilities.  Be careful at that! Crow overlords would not be fun.
I guess "King of gnat's urine" didn't fit.
Snopes starts off by talking about it being a legend, and then talking about the different forms that the story has taken over the years.  It's urban legend, 100%.
Actually, it turns out that the original version of the bible most likely had Jesus turning water into beer, but then later, when wine became more widespread and was eventually seen as the more "elite" beverage, the bible went through another translation that changed the text to say that Jesus turned water into wine. Random tidbit of the day!
&gt; I don't think any religious group should get special treatment, even if that religion is all love and peace.  The *practical* implications of this are often larger than you might think. If a job requires behaviour/actions that go against the religious (or even non-religious) principles of a significant number of people, then the result is that you're much less likely to get such people doing that job (or studying at that university, or going to that gym).  And before you dismiss that with "Bah, we don't need those sort of people" - it turns out that in some cases you actually do. Crazy, I know. :)  If it turns out to be a genuinely necessary requirement, that's one thing. But if, as in this case, the oath/affirmation is completely unnecessary and pointless - this state (California, apparently) should just give it up.  BTW dryice, the affirmation thing has been around for a while. If you want to object against that, you may be a bit late. :-)
Now you're just being obnoxious.   I buy gas (actually biodiesel - 50 MPG Jetta FTW) so I know how much it costs.  I just don't buy cow squeezings and thus I don't know nor care how much a gallon costs.   I doubt Bush 41 is much of a milk drinker either.
may these bloodlusting, two - faced quote on quote faithful believers rot and burn in hell. you have adopted america's plan for the indians, which was the basis of hitlers plan for the jews, and turned a holocaust of all morals and more lives upon yourselves. this isnnt about judaism or islam, it's about the exercise of brutality in the name of faith. fuck the zionist government there and fuck the fact that you can't be elected president here unless you are down with AIPAC and the CFR. burn baby, burn. 
One thing I didn't believe but now believe is that it is impossible to drink a gallon of whole milk in under an hour. It is one of the funniest things I have ever seen.
Both my wife and my sister assumed buttocks are filled with poop until they were 6. My wife (now 23) asked me if tide is going to happen if the moon is obscured by clouds. I LIRLd.
americanuck's yelling aside, this is a topic of the highest importance.  The self-censorship of journalists affects our cultural worldview, and diverts us from a truthful and rational discussion of events. 
Well, the stupidity of Americans doesn't really phase me anymore. I usually just try to ignore it or pretend they are joking about being so stupid.
I hear they're hiring on Broadway. Seems with the low USD, all the UK faggits are visiting our shows.
Er... only if it was non-consensual.  Was this a trick somehow?
I thought I'd probably be some kind of scientist, building inventions in my space lab, in space.
There is a chair in the left of the picture.  Just FYI.
Supreme executive power derives from a mandate from the masses, not from some farcical nutritional ceremony!
I can't wait till this asswipe is out of office.
I was afraid that was going to be a rickroll.
Homeschooled. Gets 'em every time.
Sure, but that's not the point. The point is that a responsible person also takes responsiblity for the conditions under which they are non-forcibly penetrated. The ad-hominems are response to neglecting to point of the article - or maybe just giving credence to the negative point of the article - that men should "become the guardians of female well-being".
but How is that in any way different from the current situation?  As soon as you're not actually trading on the real value of the gold, you're trading on the same government backed promise that Gold standards advocated hate so much.  Only difference is that it would be easy for china and russia to cripple the US economy by saying they'll buy any gold people can sell them, pushing up the price of the gold (which in turn raises the value of the dollar). The government is forced to attempt to devalue the dollar again so that exports aren't crippled.  China and russia then can go "ok we're selling all our gold" and the newly devalued dollar plummets even further causing a major risk of hyperinflation.  The gold standard simply can't exist in a global economy because financial warfare would be incredibly easy.
Our drug policy promotes the use of the most addictive, the most deadly recreational drugs -- alcohol and tobacco -- while using violence to deter the use of far safer and non-addictive drugs like marijuana or ecstasy.  The consequence of this policy is that many, many millions of people are dead.  We know that this is the consequence, and what do we do?  We continue the policy.
Even if this story were precisely true as read, which I doubt, the only difference between these two shallow, judgmental whores was that one opened her mouth first.  
Oh \*that's\* freakin' new :/
Well played sir, well played.
Guess how they make Thousand Island dressing. Go ahead. Guess. And no, it wasn't used on a thousand islands.
what would you use instead, and under what circumstances?
I'm voting this one sideways. Or perhaps somewhere along the Z axis.
First, "we" did not give it to them. For the most part they got it themselves. Second, they had it there because they have been there since before there were Muslims. They are the minority in the region, but they were the majority in the land set up for the Jewish state. The Arabs did not want that Jewish state and they attacked, and lost. People who start and lose wars do not generally get a do-over. Finally, Israel is not some "fanatical religious state", it is mostly secular and the most religious people there tend to withdraw from the state. You might want to learn about the topic, then post.
I really like having fresh junk.  I keep baby wipes next to the toilet at home for just this reason.  There's nothing more invigorating than a freshly-baby-wiped scrotum.
There's a filter.
The issue is not what the milk itself contains, because there's nothing in the milk that isn't in milk from untreated cows. All they can say is "not from cows treated with rBST."
Zionist = apologist?
I would go with something close to pre-1967, add Jerusalem and a little surrounding area, and discuss the Golan with Syria.
&gt;Wow, bad Arabs, how thoughtful. So much imagination. I'm sure the REAL villians will turn out to be white guys in the U.S. government and big corporations.
Now that's the best comment here. Welcome to Amerika.
Your history is shit.  You view everything through a gauze of racial hatred and it appears it has very nearly driven you insane.
Damn straight.   I grew up in a trailor park. Go ahead and make fun of that if you must. I will forever resent privilege.
there are so many different kinds of smart though. Often the MIT geniuses (at what they do) in other areas of their lives are morons (for example thinking Star Wars is great literature etc. Street smarts usually gets you much further than engineer smarts also. I also think those well emersed in the humanities are much more well rounded and intelligent than the computer nerd type smart.
Still no answers...
Point taken. We do however expect billboards, whereas students on a bridge with a sign could draw our eyes away for the split second it takes to cause an accident.
It's kinda like how they're remaking all the old movies and TV shows; is it just that there's nothing new on teh intarwebs anymore so we'll just keep going over the old stuff?
Don't be an asshole.
I think that what David might be getting at is that Rails developers have their own local install that they are working on, so he doesn't understand why someone would want that to be windows.
I couldn't agree more. I see the people I work with, who are all paid about the same as I am, out buying $500,000 homes, $35k cars etc, and have to pay for their groceries with a credit card. I on the other hand am able to put away almost 30% of my take home in the bank. Because we live within our means.   My wife is not working at the moment and I am supporting her, our 2 kids, one dog and my mother inlaw. And no I'm not rich. I am an IT worker who for the first time in my 25yr career broke $100k for a year. Life is good in our world.  I don't feel sorry for these people. Look at the ones that are whining, they are driving the big ole SUVs, own expensive designer purses etc. No, no pity for them, living beyond their means.
That Republicans lower taxes and don't run up deficits. (And I lean Republican and almost Libertarian, unfortunately.)
The government can attempt to control inflation through careful management of interest rates and other factors.  If there's a problem with the value of gold, there's little the government can do 
Isn't that what he wrote?
I do not like or want women, just sex with them. Does that make me wrong?
What is this "9/11" . . . I've never heard about this!  Is it like 7-11?  Why has the media not mentioned this before?!
[Here's her "email" form.](http://feinstein.senate.gov/public/index.cfm?FuseAction=ContactUS.EmailMe)
And if they're both too drunk and **she** coerces **him**?
I worked in a lab where one of my duties was to clean Sharpie off of all sorts of plastics (to reuse field vials, etc.).  Ethanol is the absolute god of Sharpie solvents.  It beats soap, acetone, isopropal, even an .5N acid bath.
Ahh, but you haven't *really* experienced Detroit excellence unless you've ridden in the back seat of the Chevy VEGA over a bumpy road.  Sheer headache bump-thud, bump-thud (first sound- the suspension bottoming out. Second sound, head hitting metal rear  window frame) I was about 5'9" at the time.
Support hose squeezing varicose veins.
Those silly Jews.
&gt; If a cop is arresting you without a warrant or probable cause, you are entitled to resist, using as much force as necessary.  No, no you're not. Same as if somebody is attacking you: you do \*not\* have *carte blanche* to use deadly force.
&gt;who do you want to answer, Laura Bush or Obama?  Neither.  I wish the system had a way of extending the primary process until an actually competent nominee comes up. The current system is like going into a restaurant wanting a proper steak, but having to eat the salad because the place doesn't have meat that day. I wish the system allows me to wait for a better candidate.  I wish.
&gt;The area now known as Israel was 90% Arab at the time of the Balfour declaration.  That is a neat bit of deception. Yes, current Israel was mostly Muslim. But the Partition Plan gave a much smaller area to Israel, an area that was at the time majority Jewish. The Arabs did not accept that, started a war, and lost.
In slander allegation truth is an absolute affirmative defence.   The Catholic Church is a Great Whore so nothing to denounce.  
more, waaaay more
This guy is so lame he is using comment moderation to hide comments that disagree with him. Here is what I tried to comment:  I think you've fundamentally misunderstood how Free Open Source Software development works. The drive behind the development of any code is either that someone is being paid to write it because a company wants it, or more often because the developer themself wants the new feature.  If DB2 support isn't very good in Rails and you want it to be better it is up to you to change it. The rest of the Rails community is under no requirement to produce software that supports your requirements, that's up to you.  As it happen I'd like to chip in and say that I am using Rails on a project with my employer where I have to deal with a complex schema with billions of rows and composite keys, and it's a veritable cakewalk to do that with ActiveRecord. If DB2 support falls far behind Oracle support that may indicate something about DB2 and / or the number of DB2 users / developers who have an interest in Rails.
I've never heard it referred to as a "keyboard" before.
I hate having to bring it to you, but Palestinians were not created overnight just to piss off Israelis. While there was no sovereign Palestine 1920â€“1948, there was a "British Mandate of Palestine", which is pretty much the same fucking thing (same families, same land, different bureaucracy). If Palestine doesn't exist, then neither does India, Pakistan, nor pretty much all of Africa and the Middle East, not to mention Asia and the Americas. But try giving any of those countries away, and see if you can wish the inhabitants away...  EDIT: My follow-up is now invisible, because  The_Ultimate_Reality's reply was down-voted into invisibility. Here it is:  I was not trying to bring the British Empire into this, I was merely pointing out the obvious: the so-called "non-existing" Palestinians had to be displaced and dispossessed in order for Israel to be created. You can use any word you want to describe what happened, but to the families and farmers, it means nothing else than being dispossessed and losing your land (I'm not even talking about "Country" or "Homeland", but simply about "houses" or "patches of grass where you grew up"), in order to give it to strangers, and all of this being decided by "higher powers" you can't even pronounce the name of, based thousands of kilometers away. 
&gt;in an ongoing relationship the girl may consent while she is sober to having sex while she is passed out. [source](http://reddit.com/info/6agjq/comments/c03bgj3)  Or is it your argument that she cannot consent to have something done while she is unconscious?  Where does that leave the status of DNR orders, or 'in case of emergency' contacts?
gilf
Not necessarily. It's at least possible to imagine that it would be consensual, or that some slaveowners might not have sex if the slave didn't consent.  There's lots of gray area here, and people have an absurd talent for being nearly monstrous in one aspect of their lives while turning around and being quite civil and humane in others.
&gt;If you think the Israelis did not start the 1967 war then you are wrong and you are Pro Jewish.  No hiding your views at least. But when Egypt kicked out the U.N. peace keepers and closed an international waterway they started a war.
He looks SO high maaaan.
FTW.  It's probably someones job to do this type of crap.  Written another way : If someone DIDN'T do this to this box they might have gotten in trouble.
You can get 5% isopropal 95% ethanol at any decent pharmacy.  It costs half of what Everclear (5% water 95% ethanol) does because it isn't taxed.
&gt; China [can] go "ok we're selling all our gold"  &gt; financial warfare would be incredibly easy  This is a *bad* example in defense of fiat money, given the state of the dollar :-)  And no, these are objections that Adam Smith rebutted.  &gt; As soon as you're not actually trading on the real value of the gold, you're trading on the same government backed promise that Gold standards advocated hate so much.  Sorry, I've no idea what you mean by this.  Or are you confusing 'exchange-value' with something backed by the State?
Yes, we've had several. And Senator Obama voted to extend the patriot act.
